<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89919-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-19-89.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 180 / Tuesday, September 19, 1989/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Fish and Wildlife Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">[50 CFR Part 20]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN-1018-AA24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Migratory Bird Hunting; Final Frameworks for Late Season MigratoryBird Hunting Regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Fish and Wildlife Service, Interior.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rule prescribes final late-season frameworks fromwhich States may select season dates, limits and other options for the1989-90 migratory bird hunting season. These late seasons include mostwaterfowl seasons, the earliest of which generally commence on or aboutOctober 1, 1989. The effects of this final rule are to facilitate the selectionof hunting seasons by the States and to further the establishment of thelate-season migratory bird hunting regulations for 1989-90. State selectionswill be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> as amendments to andSection;andSection; 20.104 through20.107 and andSection; 20.109 of Title 50 CFR part 20.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>This rule takes effect on September 19, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Send State season selections to: Director (FWS/MBMO),U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Department of the Interior, Room     634-ArlingtonSquare, Washington, DC 20240. Comments received on the proposed late-seasonframeworks are available for public inspection during normal business hoursin Room 634, Arlington Square Building, 4401 North Fairfax Drive, Arlington,Virginia.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Byron K. Williams, Acting Chief,Office of Migratory Bird Management, U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Departmentof the Interior, Room 634-Arlington Square, Washington, DC 20240. Telephone(703) 358-1714.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The Migratory Bird Treaty Act of July3, 1918 (40 Stat. 755; 16 U.S.C. 703 et seq.), as amended, authorizes anddirects the Secretary of the Interior, having due regard for the zonesof temperature and for the distribution, abundance, economic value, breedinghabits, and times and lines of flight of migratory game birds, to determinewhen, to what extent, and by what means such birds or any part, nest oregg thereof may be taken, hunted, captured, killed, possessed, sold, purchased,shipped, carried, exported or transported.On March 27, 1989, the Service published for public comment in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 12534) a proposal to amend 50 CFR part20, with comment periods ending July 23, 1989, for early- season proposals;and August 28, 1989, for the late-season proposals. The March 27 documentdealt with the establishment of hunting seasons, hours, areas and limitsfor migratory game birds under andSection;andSection; 20.101 through 20.107,20.109 and 20.110 of subpart K. On July 6, 1989, the Service publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 24290) a second document consisting ofa supplemental proposed rulemaking dealing with both the early-and late-seasonframeworks. On July 13, 1989, the Service published for public commentin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 29640) a third document consisting ofa proposed rulemaking dealing specifically with frameworks for early-seasonmigratory bird hunting regulations. On August 11, 1989, the Service publisheda fourth document (54 FR 32975) containing final frameworks for early migratorybird hunting seasons from which wildlife conservation agency officialsfrom the States, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands selected early-seasonhunting dates, hours, areas and limits for 1989-90. The fifth documentin the series, published August 16, 1989, in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 33721), deals specifically with proposedframeworks for the 1989-90 late-season migratory bird hunting regulations.On August 30, 1989, the Service published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 36008) a sixth document consisting ofa final rule amending subpart K of Title 50 CFR part 20 to set huntingseasons, hours, areas and limits for mourning, white-winged and white-tippeddoves; band-tailed pigeons; rails; moorhens and gallinules; woodcock; commonsnipe; sea ducks in certain defined areas of the Atlantic Flyway; experimentalSeptember duck seasons in identified States; experimental and special SeptemberCanada goose seasons in portions of identified States; sandhill cranesin the Central and Pacific Flyways; doves in Hawaii; migratory game birdsin Alaska, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands; and some extended falconryseasons. The seventh in the series is this document which establishes finalframeworks for late-season migratory bird hunting regulations for the 1989-90season.<ITAG tagnum="84">Review of Comments and the Service's Response</ITAG>Public hearing and written comments received through September 1, 1989,relating to proposed late season frameworks are discussed and addressedhere. The comments are discussed in the same order as the numbered itemsto which they apply. Only current numbered items are included. A continuouslist of all the numbered items used in Service documents appeared in theMarch 27, 1989, <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 12534).<T3>General Comments: </T3>The Wildlife Legislative Fund of America expressedgratification at the improved level of cooperation this year between theService and the Flyway Councils in regard to migratory bird hunting regulations.However, one local organization expressed disappointment at the lack ofcooperation.<T3>Response: </T3>The Service recognizes the value of cooperation withthe Flyway Councils, States, and all interested organizations and individuals.We will strive for improved relations and cooperation.1. Shooting Hours<T3>Public Hearing: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing the ConcernedCoastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representing the WesternMassachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee, representingthe Andover Sportsmen's Club, Inc., Mr. Jim Yoos, representing the NewJersey Waterfowl Association, Mr. Bert Jones, representing the LouisianaWildlife and Fisheries Commission, Mr. Randy Wheeler, representing theWetlands Habitat Alliance of Texas, Mr. Leon Kirkland, representing theAtlantic Flyway Council, and Mr. Jim Phillips, writer and duck hunter,supported returning to shooting hours which begin at one-half hour beforesunrise and extend to sunset. Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the NationalWildlife Federation, cautiously supported the return to pre-sunrise shootingand Mr. George Reiger, an editor for Field andamp; Stream magazine, supportedthe return only if additional restrictions in season length and bag limitsare implemented. Mr. John M. Anderson, representing the National AudubonSociety, requested that pre-sunrise shooting not be reinstated until itcan be shown to have no adverse impact on the harvest of hen mallards andblack ducks. Mr. Charles Potter, representing the North American WildlifeFoundation, recommended against the return to pre-sunrise shooting whileMr. John Grandy, representing the Humane Society of the United States,recommended that shooting hours be further restricted and not begin untilone-half hour after sunrise. <T3>Written Comments: </T3>A total of 251 letters were received from 241individuals and organizations concerning the proposed shooting hours. Ofthe 241 commenters (479 signatures), 225 (463 signatures) supported theService's proposal for pre-sunrise opening. These included the Atlantic,Central and Pacific Flyway Councils; the Lower Region Regulations Committeeof the Mississippi Flyway Council; the State wildlife agencies of Arizona,Arkansas, California, Colorado, Louisiana, Massachusetts, Mississippi,Missouri, Montana, New Mexico, New York, Oklahoma, and South Carolina;the California Fish and Game Commission; the Tourism Promotion Divisionof the North Dakota Economic Development Commission; the Texas AgriculturalExtension Service; the Louisiana Wildlife Federation; the New York StateConservation Council; the Wetland Habitat Alliance of Texas; the Alaska,California, and South Carolina Waterfowl Associations; the Sportsmen Conservationistsof Texas; 5 local organizations; 1 Congressman representing hunters inhis District; and 192 individuals. Those opposing the Service's proposalwere the Upper Region Regulations Committee of the Mississippi Flyway Council,the States of Illinois and Wisconsin, the Minnesota Waterfowl Association,the Fund for Animals, Inc., and 11 individuals. One local organizationsuggested opening shooting hours 15 minutes before sunrise for teal only.The Outdoor News magazine from Minnesota provided a partial summary ofa printed questionnaire. They provide some interpretation of the unfinishedsurvey indicating a slight preference for pre-sunrising shooting. Argumentspresented in support of a pre-sunrise opening include:a. Hunters value the pre-sunrise period and the suspension is eroding participationand support. Many duck species remain numerically low in 1989 and hunterparticipation is declining, partly due to the restrictive shooting hours.Although restrictive shooting hours may help reduce harvest somewhat, reducedhunter support results in less incentive for private management of wetlandsand fewer funds available for habitat acquisition.b. Suspension of pre-sunrise shooting will have uncertain impacts on theharvest and the harvest composition. Many fear that it will shift harvestfrom ``early-flying'' species, such as the wood duck, to ``later-flying''species, such as mallards and pintails.c. The Service accomplished more than its goal of a 25 percent reductionin 1988-89. Many commenters believe that the restrictive shooting hoursare not necessary to continue to achieve this goal, and further believethat restrictive shooting hours would save few ducks. Some commenters alsomentioned that relatively small daily bag limits and a tendency to huntlater into the day will negate any ``savings''.d. Restrictive shooting hours resulted in a loss of opportunity to harvestother species such as wood ducks and geese.e. Many commenters said they would prefer other restrictions, such as ashorter season or smaller bag limits, to restrictive shooting hours.f. The suspension will confound other regulatory evaluations.g. The restriction will likely increase shooting-hour violations.Those favoring the more restrictive sunrise opening felt that it does helpto reduce harvest and aids species identification.<T3>Response: </T3>The available evidence regarding the impact of shootinghours on harvest levels is unclear. Information from previous studies,summarized in a 1977 Environmental Assessment on shooting hours, indicatesthat only 12-15 percent of the duck harvest occurs during the one-halfhour before sunrise. Assuming that some of this harvest would still occurafter sunrise with restrictive shooting hours, this suggests that the impacton harvest reduction of restricting shooting hours to a sunrise openinglikely is small. Further, the studies mentioned above also suggest thatthe impact of a later opening differs among species. For example, the proportionof harvest occurring during the one-half hour before sunrise was 25 percentfor wood ducks (whose status is satisfactory) versus 12 percent for blackducks, 14 percent for redheads, and 7 percent for canvasbacks. This lendssome support to the argument presented above that delaying the openingof shooting hours may shift hunting pressure toward species of greatestconcern. Regardless of the time of day, species specific regulations placea burden of responsibility on hunters and they must choose whether to shootor not.Because of (1) the uncertainty about the impact of shooting hours on harvest,particularly among species, (2) the overwhelming sentiment among commentersfavoring pre-sunrise shooting hours, and (3) other components of strategyto restrict harvest to levels comparable to last year. The Service believesit is appropriate to return to the one-half hour before sunrise openingof shooting hours for the 1989 hunting seasons.2. Framework for Ducks in the Conterminous United States_Outside Dates,Season Length, and Bag Limits<ITAG tagnum="81">a. Harvest Strategy</ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing theConcerned Coastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsmen's Club, Inc., Mr. Jim Yoos, representingthe New Jersey Waterfowl Association, and Mr. Leon Kirkland, representingthe Atlantic Flyway Council argued that ducks harvested in the AtlanticFlyway are not derived from the drought stricken mid-continent region andthat the flyway should not be subjected to the same harvest restrictionsimposed on the Central and Mississippi Flyways. They maintain that populationsbreeding in eastern Canada and the northeastern States have not declinedand are more productive than western populations; and as a result, expressconcern that the Service is managing duck populations with a ``broad brush''approach rather than on a flyway basis. Mr. Randy Wheeler, representingthe Wetlands Habitat Alliance of Texas, believed that the proposed regulationsare overly restrictive. Mr. Bert Jones, representing the Louisiana Wildlifeand Fisheries Commission, applauded the Service for not further reducinghunting opportunity and Mr. Mike Berger, representing Ducks Unlimited,Inc., stated that duck hunters are willing to take a conservative approachto harvest but that regulations should be based on sound biology. Mr. DougInkley, representing the National Wildlife Federation, Mr. Gary Myers,representing the Wildlife Society, and Mr. John M. Anderson, representingthe National Audubon Society, supported maintaining the conservative duckregulations. Mr. John H. Vizer, III, representing the Berry B. Brooks Foundation,said that many people favor a complete closure of duck hunting, but indicatedthat such a closure may not generally be accepted and so he urged thatthe 1988 restrictive regulations be maintained in 1989. Mr. Charles Potter,representing the North American Wildlife Foundation, Mr. George Reiger,an editor for Field andamp; Stream magazine, Mr. John Grandy, representingthe Humane Society of the United States, and Mr. Jim Phillips, writer andduck hunter, recommended restricting regulations further in 1989.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>A member of Congress from Massachusetts, theAtlantic Flyway Council, the State wildlife agencies of Massachusetts andNew York, the New York State Conservation Council, the New Hampshire WaterfowlAssociation, 3 local organizations and 4 individuals commented that harvestregulations for the Atlantic Flyway have been unnecessarily restrictive.Many of these asked that the Service consider a return to a 40-day season.They argue that there is no biological justification for imposing shorterseasons and impacting hunter participation when many of the ducks harvestedin the Flyway breed in eastern Canada and the northeastern States and havenot declined to the same extent as western breeding populations. They citethe improved population index of major dabbling and diving duck speciesduring the mid-winter survey in the Flyway as evidence for more liberalseason lengths and state that more than enough data is available to warranta conservative 40-day season. In general, they express concern that theService has ignored recommendations of the Atlantic Flyway Council andthat the lack of fairness in setting regulations for the Atlantic Flywaywill ``continue to erode hunter support and cause further declines in duckstamp sales.'' The Central Flyway Council expressed support for the proposedframeworks but opposed the suspension of special harvest strategies. ThePacific Flyway Council stated that the restrictive regulations and thelow fall flight contributed to the abandonment of waterfowl hunting in1988 and may have damaged some States' ability to maintain waterfowl managementprograms and private sector support of wetland habitat. The States of California,Colorado, and South Carolina, the New York State Conservation Council,the California Waterfowl Association, 4 local organizations, and 10 individualsremarked that restrictions were excessive. The State of Missouri said restrictionswere substantial and necessary, however, the Service should refrain fromfurther modifications in 1989. If additional restrictions are warranted,they suggest the Service consider those regulations components that havethe most predictable impact on harvest, such as season length and frameworkdates. The South Carolina Waterfowl Association was in favor of conservative,but not overly restrictive, regulations. The States of Minnesota and Wisconsin,the North Dakota Tourism Promotion, The Wildlife Management Institute,and 11 individuals supported restrictive regulations. The Minnesota WaterfowlAssociation, the Fund for Animals, Inc., and 13 individuals recommendedfurther restrictions. Many commenters were concerned that restrictive regulationswere contributing to decreased hunter participation and a decline in duckstamp sales. They cited associated declines in financial support for waterfowland less incentive for private land management efforts.<T3>Response: </T3>In 1988, restrictive regulations and low populationlevels of ducks resulted in a harvest reduction of about 50 percent fromthe 1987 harvest level. The Service anticipates a fall flight in 1989 similarto that of 1988 and believes maintaining the harvest at reduced levelsis appropriate considering the poor status of ducks. Harvest rates arehigher in the Atlantic and Mississippi Flyways than in the Central andPacific Flyways, and this is reflected in regulations that are more restrictivein the East. Little production data is available from outside the surveyedareas upon which to base management programs. Also, ducks migrating tothe Atlantic Flyway originate both from within and outside the surveyedareas. The Service acknowledges the need for expanded population and productionsurveys to facilitate the management of waterfowl by individual flywaysor population management units. The Service, in cooperation with Canadianinterests, is striving to initiate breeding ground surveys in the currentlyunsurveyed portions of eastern Canada and northeastern United States. TheService is concerned about the decreased participation in duck huntingand does attempt to provide that amount of recreational opportunity thatcan be accommodated without damaging the resource. Our goal is to establishregulations that protect the breeding stock and yet provide sufficientrecreational opportunity to retain hunters that support and fund habitatand management efforts. We recognize that for some, hunting opportunitiesare necessary incentives to maintain waterfowl habitats, while others wouldmaintain habitat even during closed seasons. The Service appreciates thesupport for conservative frameworks and encourages the continued supportfor habitat management programs. The 1989 frameworks (framework dates,season length and bag limits) are essentially the same as those in effectduring 1988-89.<ITAG tagnum="81">b. Framework Dates</ITAG>i. <T3>Opening and Closing Dates_Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Doug Inkley,representing the National Wildlife Federation, recommended maintainingrestricted framework dates with a closing date of January 7 for ducks inall flyways.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Atlantic Flyway Council recommended thatthe regular season framework for ducks in the Atlantic Flyway open on October1, 1989 and close on January 8, 1990. They stated that this earlier openingdate will provide northern States increased opportunity to harvest birdsproduced in eastern areas and that continuing last years closing date willmaintain restrictions on the harvest of prairie-produced birds in the southernportion of the flyway. The Upper Region Regulations Committee of the MississippiFlyway Council, and the Pacific Flyway Council recommended framework datesof October 7 through January 7. The Lower Region Regulations Committeeof the Mississippi Flyway Council recommended frameworks closing on January14, 1990. The Central Flyway Council recommended that season frameworkdates should begin on the Saturday nearest October 1 (9/30/89) and on theSunday nearest January 20 (1/21/90) as allowed for many years. The ColoradoDivision of Wildlife supported the Central Flyway Council recommendationfor a floating framework and added that mid-latitude States with high elevationsand early freeze-up are unduly restricted. The National Wildlife Federationsupported the closing date of January 7. The States of Missouri and Wisconsinsupported the Service proposal for framework dates. One individual fromVirginia and one from Texas requested later framework dates.<T3>Response: </T3>The period during which hunting seasons can be heldis an important influence on harvest levels. In 1988, the Service furtherrestricted framework dates as part of an overall regulations package designedto reduce harvest. Without this change in framework dates even greaterrestrictions in other regulations would have been necessary to reach theharvest reduction obtained. Framework dates for 1989, October 7 throughJanuary 7, are essentially the same as in 1988-89.ii. <T3>Rest Days_Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representingthe Concerned Coastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsmen's Club, Inc., and Mr. George Reiger,an editor for Fieldandamp;Stream magazine recommended compensatory days begiven to States with prohibitions against hunting on Sundays.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>Compensatory days were recommended by a memberof Congress from Massachusetts and 3 individuals to make-up for days lostto hunting on Sundays due to State restrictions. Some individuals endorsedrest days. One individual recommended hunting on Wednesdays through Saturdaysonly, 1 individual recommended no hunting on Wednesdays and Sundays, andanother recommended no hunting on Mondays or Thursdays.<T3>Response: </T3>It is noted that the rest days that result because ofno Sunday hunting may not represent a reduced harvest of waterfowl. Infact, rest days are a well recognized harvest management techniques andmany gunning clubs, private properties, and State-managed areas regularlyinstitute rest days and half-day shooting to hold birds and prolong andincrease harvest opportunities. Under these circumstances, it does notappear that States that ban Sunday hunting are at a disadvantage in termsof waterfowl harvest. The Service has addressed a ban on Sunday huntingpreviously and continues to believe that the loss of opportunity becauseof a State restriction is a matter for local resolution. In regard to allowingadditional days for closed periods during an open season, such an adjustmentis considered a form of season splitting. The Service currently allowsa maximum of 3 splits in Atlantic and Central Flyway States in lieu ofzoning and only 2 splits in all States that zone. The Service does notoffer compensatory days. <ITAG tagnum="81">c. Season Length </ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing theConcerned Coastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsmen's Club, Inc., Mr. Jim Yoos, representingthe New Jersey Waterfowl Association, and Mr. Leon Kirkland, representingthe Atlantic Flyway Council, recommended a 40-day season for the AtlanticFlyway. Mr. George Reiger, an editor for Field andamp; Stream magazine, recommendeda 20-day season and Mr. Jim Phillips, writer and duck hunter, recommendeda 21-day season. <T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Atlantic Flyway Council recommended a 40-dayseason in that Flyway and stated that this season length would representa compromise between a desire for increased harvest in the northern endof the flyway and continued conservative harvest in the southern end ofthe flyway. The Lower Region Regulations Committee of the Mississippi FlywayCouncil supported contiuation of last year's season lengths. The PacificFlyway Council presented a package that would allow States an option of7 additional days in lieu of other options, but othewise supported continuationsof the 1988 season lengths. The Colorado Division of Wildlife recommendsusing season length for making adjustments in harvest when it is backedup by solid data. The South Carolina Waterfowl Association recommends usingseason length to achieve reductions in harvest if that action is needed.Many other commenters remarked that season length was a preferred regulatorymechanism for controlling harvest. The State wildlife agencies of Massachusettsand New York, the New York State Conservation Council, the California andNew Hampshire Waterfowl Associations, 3 local organizations, and 6 individualsrecommended longer duck hunting seasons. The States of Missouri and Wisconsinand 2 individuals supported the proposed season lengths; while 4 individualsrecommended shorter seasons. In addition, the Arkansas Game and Fish Commissionmade a proposal for forfeiting afternoon hunting in exchange for a longerseason. <T3>Response: </T3>Season length is an important mechanism in regulatingharvest. Season lengths were reduced proportionately in all flyways in1988 as part of a regulations package designed to reduce harvest. Sincepopulation levels have not improved for many species of ducks since lastyear, the Service believes that increasing the season length is not warranted.In regard to the Arkansas proposal, the Service notes that half-day shootingis a managment technique used to hold birds to prolong and increase harvestopportunities. Morning only hunting will not likely result in reduced harvest.The 1989 season lengths are essentially the same as those in effect during1988-89. <ITAG tagnum="81">d. Closed Seasons </ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. John H. Vizer, III representing theBerry B. Brooks foundation, indicated that while many people favor completeclosure of duck hunting, this may not be generally accepted. Mr. John Grandy,representing the Humane Society of the United States, recommended completeclosure on all ducks, especially on harlequin ducks in the Atlantic Flywayand nationwide for pintails. Mr. Jim Phillips, writer and duck hunter,and Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the National Wildlife Federation, recommendedclosures on pintail hunting in 1989-90. <T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Atlantic Flyway Council recommended a closureon harlequin ducks to provide added protection to the small eastern populationthat winters in eastern Canada and the northeast United States. In regardto the general duck season, one individual stated a willingness to accepta temporary closure as long as it did not become permanent, while anotherindividual recommended closing the season in alternating geographical regionsif populations warranted this action. A closed season for ducks in 1989was requested by 12 individuals. The National Wildlife Federation recommendeda closed season for canvasbacks and pintails, while the Fund for Animals,Inc., recommended a closed season for all ducks but especially for canvasbacks,harlequin ducks, pintails, and black ducks. <T3>Response: </T3>The Service acknowledges concern regarding the harlequinduck. The 1989 frameworks include a closed season on harlequin ducks inthe Atlantic Flyway. The closure on canvasback ducks has been lifted inthe Pacific Flyway only and is dicussed under item 12. <T3>Canvasback and Redhead Ducks. </T3>In regard to pintails, the Serviceconsidered but rejected the alternative of no open season on pintails.The pintail nests throughout the northern hemisphere from the tundra toareas in North America as far south as the Central Valley of California.Its primary breeding area is the arid grassland of the northcentral Statesand southern Canada, though significant breeding stocks are found in openhabitats within and along the edges of the boreal forest. The pintail populationof the prairies has been declining since the early 1970's. The primarycause of the pintail population decline is drought in the prairies. Suitableconditions for pintail reproduction have not occurred on the prairies formore than a decade. The Service regulations in recent years have recognizedthe low population levels of the pintail. These regulations have been effectivein sharply reducing the harvest rate on pintails and the Service believesthe 1989-90 frameworks provide adequate protection for this year's flight.However, if the traditional breeding areas of this species remain dry anddeclines in North American stocks of pintails continue, hunting restrictions,including complete closure, will be considered. In regard to a nationwideclosure on duck hunting, the Service considered this option in the EnvironmentalAssessment, <T3>Waterfowl Hunting Regulations for 1989. </T3>Restrictive regulationswere established in 1988 and are being continued in 1989, however, completeclosure is acknowledged as a possible future action depending upon habitatsand populations. Many correspondents noted that a closed season would eliminatemost of the revenue that is currently received from license and stamp sales,as well as eliminate private landowner incentives to maintain habitat.The Service has attempted to balance all the arguements in its proposedaction. As further protection, the Service may institute specific closuresif the need arises. <ITAG tagnum="81">e. Bag Limits  </ITAG>i. <T3>Conventional Limits</T3>_<T3>Public Hearing Comments:</T3> Mr. George Reiger, an editor for Fieldandamp; Stream magazine, recommended a bag limit of 2 ducks. Mr. Jim Phillips,writer and duck hunter, recommended a ``3-2-1'' limit whereby only 3 duckscould be taken, but no more than 2 of any species and no more than 1 henmallard or 1 black duck or 1 redhead duck. Mr. Phillps further recommendeda nationwide closure on pintails as did Mr. Doug Inkley, representing theNational Wildlife Federation, and Mr. John Grandy, representing the HumaneSociety of the United States.  <T3>Written Comments:</T3> The Atlantic and Central Flyway Councils, andthe Upper Region Regulations Committee of the Mississippi Flyway Council,recommended continuing last year's limits. The Lower Region RegulationsCommittee of the Mississippi Flyway Council recommended continuing the3-bird bag, but would include species restrictions that would only allow1 black duck or 1 hen mallard. The Pacific Flyway Council recommended thesame limits as were in effect during 1988-89 for all ducks except canvasbacks,and species restrictions in bag limit to include 1 canvasback, 2 redheads,or 1 canvasback and 1 redhead combination. The Colorado Division of Wildlifeendorsed using bag limits to adjust harvest levels. The States of Minnesota,Missouri, and Wisconsin, 1 local organization, and 9 individuals supportedthe proposed limits. The New York State Conservation Council recommendedremaining at a 3 duck per day bag limit. Although they felt this limitis too restrictive, they said it may be wise to remain with this limitfor 1989. The States of California and New York, the California WaterfowlAssociation, 2 local organizations, and 7 individuals recommend increasingthe bag limit. Further restrictions were recommended by 4 individuals.Many commenters, especially those that support a point system, encouragedthe Service to restrict on duck species that are at depressed levels, butto increase hunting opportunity on abundant species. One individual recommendeda 4-mallard limit for the Pacific Flyway. The Alaska Department of Fishand Game, the California Fish and Game Commission, and one individual requestedliberalization for pintails while one hunting club in Texas requested additionalrestrictions on pintails.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Service believes that continuing last year's restrictivebag limits is appropriate given the current status of ducks. The Serviceagrees with the philosophy of shifting harvest to more abundant species,but the opportunity for this action is limited to 1989. The restrictiveversion of the point system in the Mississippi and Central Flyways is aneffort to shift harvest away from species at particularly low levels. TheService believes that it is prudent to provide the current level of protectionto all species pending improvements on the breeding grounds and correspondingrebound in population levels.  ii. <T3>Point System</T3>_<T3>Public Hearing Comments:</T3> Mr. Randy Wheeler, representing the WetlandsHabitat Alliance of Texas, encouraged reinstatement of the point systemwith changes that would provide an incentive for hunters to direct theirharvest toward more abundant species. Mr. George Reiger, an editor forField andamp; Stream magazine, and Mr. John M. Anderson, representing theNational Audubon Society, recommended against reinstatement because theprohibition against reordering is difficult to enforce.  <T3>Written Comments:</T3> One member of Congress from Texas, the Lowerand Upper Region Regulations Committees of the Mississippi Flyway Council,the Central and Pacific Flyway Councils, the State wildlife agencies ofColorado, Missouri, New Mexico and Oklahoma, the Texas Agricultural ExtensionService, 2 local organizations from Texas, and 59 individuals from Texas,recommended that the point system option be reinstated. They cited thegreater ability of that system over the conventional bag limit in reducingharvest on species of greatest concern, such as mallards and pintails,while redirecting harvest toward species such as green-winged teal whichexhibit better status. The Wisconsin Bureau of Wildlife Management recommendedthat, with continuing low populations of ducks, the strongly conservativeframeworks initiated in 1988 be maintained. One local organization fromTexas recommended against its reinstatement due to the ``reordering'' problem.The Fund for Animals, Inc., and 3 individuals recommended against reinstatementof the point system, suggesting that the system is likely to cause abuseof the regulations, and another individual described how the point systemis more conservative but did not make a specific recommendation. The AtlanticFlyway Council made no specific recommendation but indicated it is reviewinginformation on the point system.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Service is offering the point system this year inthe Central and Mississippi Flyways, but the point values are such thatno more of any one species or total ducks may be taken than under the conventionalbag, thus, it is at least as restrictive as, and potentially more restrictivethan, the conventional bag system. The Service believes this restrictiveform of the point system, which was recommended by the Central Flyway Council,reflects the poor status of most duck populations and will result in thetaking of no more ducks, and probably fewer, than would be taken underthe conventional bag. A thorough evaluation of the point system is stillunderway and should be completed prior to the 1990 regulations cycle. 3. American Black Ducks  <T3>Written Comments:</T3> The Atlantic Flyway Council, the Upper RegionRegulations Committee of the Mississippi Flyway Council, and a representativefrom the New York State Conservation Council supported continuation ofthe one black duck daily bag limit.<T3>Response: </T3>Efforts to maintain a reduced level of harvest on blackducks continue in effect in the Atlantic and Mississippi Flyways. The Servicenotes the support for the black duck bag limit.4. Wood Ducksi. <T3>Increasing Bag Limit</T3>_<T3>Written Comments: </T3>Ten individuals from Texas recommended thatthe bag limit on wood ducks in that State be liberalized, with some specifyinga change to allow 3 instead of 2 wood ducks in the bag. The rationale presentedis that wood ducks in east Texas appear to be very abundant.<T3>Response: </T3>The Service believes that recommendations for more liberalbag limits, seasons, and other regulations should be fully considered bythe appropriate Flyway Councils since any liberalization such as this wouldaffect more than just the State where it is proposed. Wood duck bag limitrestrictions have been in place since the early 1900's when the specieswas at critically low levels. Some special harvest opportunities have beenallowed in the Mississippi and Atlantic Flyways in recent years, but onlyafter considerable research and banding efforts indicated that additionalharvest would not adversely affect local or migrant populations. Even theseare being reconsidered in light of apparent declines in survival ratesand a lack of adequate banding and population data. Consideration of amore liberal bag limit for wood ducks in east Texas would first need tobe justified through studies of the population status and an adequate bandingprogram on a regionwide or flywaywide basis. Thus, the Service will notliberalize the wood duck bag limit in Texas at this time.ii. <T3>Liberal October Option</T3>_<T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Leon Kirkland, representing the AtlanticFlyway Council, recommended continuing the liberal October wood duck baglimit option. <T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Atlantic Flyway Council, the North CarolinaWildlife Resources Commission, and 1 individual from North Carolina recommendedthat the liberal October bag limit option be continued and that the Serviceprovide guidelines for improving the evaluation of these seasons. NorthCarolina argued that the Service action to suspend these seasons was unexpected,capricious, and inconsiderate of the time and money spent to date to bandwood ducks. Also, since the status of wood ducks is a non-crisis situation,they argue that the Service has ``clearly jumped the gun'' and not actedin a consistent manner to suspend seasons in other States having earlywood duck options.<T3>Response: </T3>In a letter to the Atlantic Flyway Council dated July28, 1988, the Service requested that existing information on wood duckharvests be reviewed, data requirements be considered, and management goalsbe outlined. In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> dated March 27, 1989 (54 FR 12539), the Servicegave notice of possible change pending the completion of this review. Atthis point, data requirements for special harvest opportunities on woodducks have not been fulfilled and the Service, Council and individual Statescollectively have failed to deal with the issue broadly enough. Pendingthe outcome of the review and development of an overall wood duck harveststrategy the liberal October option is suspended. The Service will awaitthe Flyway's review before making future recommendations for special harvestopportunities on wood ducks.7. Extra Teal Option<T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing theConcerned Coastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsmen's Club Inc., Mr. Jim Yoos, representingthe New Jersey Waterfowl Association, and Mr. Leon Kirkland, representingthe Atlantic Flyway Council, recommended a bonus option of 2 green-wingedteal for 9 days.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Atlantic, Central and Pacific Flyway Councilsreviewed the issue of bonus teal and other bonus ducks in the bag limitand recommend that options for bonus ducks, including teal, be offeredwhen the status of the species involved warrant additional harvests. TheNew York Division of Fish and Wildlife supported bonus teal options, indicatingthat the State was unfairly restricted in 1988 when bonus ducks were suspended.The South Carolina Wildlife and Freshwater Fisheries Division recommendedthat bonus green-winged teal be reinstated in the bag limit, citing therelatively healthy status of this species and the need to take advantageof these species by providing additional hunting opportunity on those specieswhen the status of other species is poor. The Upper Region RegulationsCommittee of the Mississippi Flyway Council and the Wisconsin Bureau ofWildlife Management recommended against allowing bonus teal, citing thepoor status of duck populations in general. Two conservation organizationsand 2 local organizations recommended that bonus teal options be reinstatedin the Atlantic Flyway. Eight individuals, all but one from Texas, madegeneral recommendations for more liberal limits on teal.<T3>Response: </T3>Bonus teal options offered in the past were designedto take advantage of blue-winged teal which were believed to be lightlyharvested. The bonus option was available to those States not eligiblefor or not taking a special September teal season. Green-winged teal wereincluded primarily because of the problem of distinguishing between thetwo species and because the harvest of greenwings as bonus birds was lowcompared to the normal, regular season harvest of greenwings. No Servicebonus options were designed to direct harvest specifically toward green-wingedteal. At the present time, blue-winged teal populations are at a recordlow level. Further, because of overall low duck populations, special harvestoptions do not seem warranted at this time. Therefore, the extra teal bonusis suspended in 1989.9. Special Scaup Season<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The State of Wisconsin supported the suspensionof the special scaup season. The New York Division of Fish and Wildlifebelieves the suspension of the special seasons in the Long Island Zoneremains unjustified. An organization from New York requested reinstatementof the special scaup season for New York.<T3>Response: </T3>The scaup breeding population reached a record low in1989. Special harvest opportunities are not deemed warranted on a specieswhen the population is at such a low level. The special scaup season willremain suspended.10. Extra Scaup Option<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The New York Division of Fish and Wildlife,the New York State Conservation Council, one local organization and oneindividual from New York requested reinstatement of the bonus bag limiton scaup. The Wisconsin Bureau of Wildlife Management and the Upper RegionRegulations Committee of the Mississippi Flyway Council supported the suspensionfor bonus scaup.<T3>Response: </T3>The extra scaup option remains suspended in 1989-90for the reasons presented in item 9 above.11. Mergansers<T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing theConcerned Coastal Sportsmens Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsmens Club, Inc., and Mr. George Reiger,an editor for Fieldandamp;Stream magazine, recommended liberalizing the seasonon mergansers along the East Coast to reduce problems of predation on fish.Mr. John Grandy, representing the Humane Society, proposed that mergansersbe included in the duck limits in all flyways.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Wisconsin Bureau of Wildlife Managementrecommended that regulations for mergansers be the same as last year. TheMinnesota Department of Natural Resources supported separate bag limitsfor mergansers in the conventional option for the regular duck season.<T3>Response: </T3>There may be localized problems with mergansers impactingfisheries in the northeast United States. Bona fide problem areas shouldbe delineated and existing options examined to determine appropriate controlmethods. The Service doubts that a flywaywide increase in the merganserbag limit is a proper or effective way to address localized depredationon fisheries. Concerning comments that all mergansers should be includedin the regular duck bag limit, the Service has no information to suggestthat the population or harvest of any merganser warrants additional restrictionsat this time. The merganser frameworks are unchanged from 1988-89.12. Canvasback and Redhead Ducks<T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the NationalWildlife Federation, Mr. Charles Potter, representing the North AmericanWildlife Foundation, Mr. George Reiger, an editor for Fieldandamp;Streammagazine, Mr. John Grandy, representing the Humane Society, and Mr. JimPhillips, a writer and duck hunter, recommended that the Service continuethe nationwide closure on canvasbacks that was in place last year.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Wisconsin Bureau of Wildlife Managementsupported continuation of seasons and limits on readheads and the closedseason on canvasback as occurred last year. A regional representative forthe New York State Conservation Council proposed a daily bag limit thatwould include one canvasback because that species was numerous in his region.One individual from California recommended allowing 1 canvasback in thebag.<T3>Response: </T3>Following harvest guidelines in the ``1983 EnvironmentalAssessment on Canvasback Hunting,'' canvasbacks are managed as a ``western''and ``eastern'' population, with 3-year average breeding populations of140,000 and 360,000 canvasbacks, respectively, for thresholds below whichno hunting would be considered. Both populations have been below thosethresholds, and seasons on the two populations were not open in any Statein 1988. The 1989 count increased the average index in the western populationto a level that would allow hunting. Therefore, the Service is allowinga season on canvasbacks in the Pacific Flyway, but with daily bag and possessionlimits more restrictive than those which had been permitted prior to theseason closure last year.13. Duck Zones<ITAG tagnum="81">a. Zones</ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing theConcerned Coastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsman's Club, Inc., and Mr. Jim Yoos, representingthe New Jersey Waterfowl Association, expressed support for the zone concept.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Atlantic, Central and Pacific Flyway Councils,the Lower Region Regulations Committee of the Mississippi Flyway Council,the New York Division of Fish and Wildlife, the New York State ConservationCouncil and 3 local organizations supported the zoning concept. One individualfrom Texas recommended that Texas be allowed to create a third, new zonefor the State. The Idaho Fish and Game Department and 5 individuals requestedthat the State be zoned into 2 large zones because of markedly differentelevational and climatic conditions affecting availability of birds andopportunities for hunters. The Pacific Flyway Council supported the Idahoproposal. The Wisconsin Bureau of Wildlife Management concurred with theService proposal that the use of zones should be reviewed and further statedtheir continued use be reconsidered if populations do not show significantimprovements.<T3>Response: </T3>The Service is currently reviewing the use of zonesas a duck harvest management tool. No new zones are permitted prior tocompletion of this review. The final frameworks include provision for continuationof present zones.<ITAG tagnum="81">b. Splits</ITAG><T3>Written Comments: </T3>The Pacific Flyway Council recommended retentionof the option to split seasons into 2 segments, the Central Flyway Counciland the Lower Region Regulations Committee of the Mississippi Flyway Councilrecommended that States be allowed to split their regular season into 3segments in lieu of zoning. The Atlantic Flyway Council, the New York Divisionof Fish and Wildlife, the New York State Conservation Council, and 1 localorganization supported the option to split seasons. The Wisconsin Bureauof Wildlife Management concurred with the Service that the use of splitsshould be reviewed and further stated that their continued use be reconsideredif populations do not show significant improvements. One individual fromWisconsin was against States having the option to split seasons. Threeindividuals suggested hunting schemes involving mandatory rest days, aform of season splitting, and have been summarized and addressed underheading 2.b.ii. <T3>Rest days</T3>.<T3>Response: </T3>The Service recognizes the request for a 3-way splitin the Mississippi Flyway and realizes that this is currently an optionin the Atlantic and Central Flyways. The Service is reviewing the use ofsplits as a duck harvest management tool. The final frameworks includeprovision for continuation of present splits but the Service believes nonew splits should be permitted prior to completion of this review.14. Frameworks for Geese and Brant in the Conterminous United States_OutsideDates, Season Length and Bag Limits<ITAG tagnum="81">General</ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. George Reiger, an editor for Fieldandamp;Streammagazine, urged caution in using more liberalized goose regulations tooffset restrictions on ducks and Mr. John M. Anderson, representing theNational Audubon Society, supported continuation of 1988 regulations forgeese.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>The National Wildlife Federation supported continuationof the goose frameworks.Atlantic Flyway<T3>Public Hearing Comments: </T3>Mr. Frank Anderson, representing theConcerned Coastal Sportsmen's Association, Mr. John Sawyer, representingthe Western Massachusetts Duck Hunters Association, and Mr. Jerry Woodmansee,representing the Andover Sportsmen's Club, Inc., recommend that the Serviceoffer a 90-day season in Massachusetts to control growing numbers of nuisanceCanada geese.<T3>Written Comments: </T3>One individual from New York supported the 90-dayCanada goose season with 3 Canada geese daily, one individual from Virginiasupported the 2 Canada geese per day limit, and one local organizationfrom Massachusetts suggested increasing the Canada goose season lengthfrom 70 to 90 days statewide. One local organization from Massachusettsrequested that the Service review the problem of nuisance Canada geesein the State. The Pennsylvania Game Commission recommended a bag increasefrom 2 to 3 Canada geese in 4 Pennsylvania counties. The Atlantic FlywayCouncil recommended retaining a 2 goose limit in those Pennsylvania counties,rescinded its recommendation for an increase in the Atlantic brant baglimit, continued to recommend an increase in the greater snow goose baglimit, and supported an expansion of the special Delaware area, establishmentof a special late season in Georgia, and continuation of Connecticut'sexperimental resident Canada goose season. The Wildlife Management Instituterecommended restrictive regulations on Atlantic brant, greater snow geeseand Atlantic Canada geese to accelerate population recovery.An amended recommendation from the Atlantic Flyway Council seeks a reductionin season length from 70 to 60 days in Maryland, Delaware, and the EasternShore of Virginia. The Service proposed the Council action be extendedto include the Western Shore of Virginia. The State of Virginia and 10individuals from Virginia expressed opposition to the Service proposalto include the Western Shore of Virginia in the more restrictive regulationsdeveloped for the Chesapeake Bay segment of Atlantic Canada geese. Thecomments indicated that hunting pressure exerted by Virginia hunters waslight compared to the Delmarva Peninsula where Canada goose numbers havedeclined and that the Atlantic Flyway Council recommended the western shoreof Virginia be excluded from these restrictions, that winter counts areincreasing, that harvests and harvest rates are low and finally that survivalis essentially stable on this population segment of Canada geese.<T3>Response:</T3> The Service notes the support of 2 individuals pertainingto the goose regulations. The request for a 90-day season in Massachusettsand a review of nuisance geese in that State are best initiated throughthe State.The Service concurs with the Atlantic Flyway Councils views in rejectingincreased bag limits on Canada geese in 4 western Pennsylvania counties,in rescinding an earlier call for an increased bag limit on Atlantic brant,in an increase of the greater snow goose bag limit from 4 to 5 per day,in initiating a special late Canada goose season on resident geese in Georgia,and limited expansion of the special snow goose area in Delaware. In addition,the Service supports the action of the Flyway Council to reduce the seasonlength on the Chesapeake Bay segment of Atlantic Canada geese in responseto problems involving low recruitment since 1985. However, the Servicedoes not support splitting off the Western Shore of Virginia from the ChesapeakeBay population. In Virginia, data from neck collar studies shows that aconsiderable exchange occurs between birds from the Western Shore of Virginia,the Delmarva Peninsula, and western Maryland. Also, survival rate informationshows that geese marked in Virginia and Maryland both show declining survivalrates. The Service view is that the Chesapeake Bay population is well definedby the neck collaring study and the evidence supports a unified managementof this flock. The regulations frameworks in this document reflect thisview.Mississippi Flyway<T3>Written Comments:</T3> The Upper Region Regulations Committee of theMississippi Flyway Council and the State of Wisconsin endorsed a changein the boundary of Iowa's Southwest Goose Zone. The Upper Region RegulationsCommittee also endorsed a request from the Indiana Department of NaturalResources to split its goose season within existing zones into 3 segments.The Arkansas Game and Fish Commission requested that the State be permittedto have a Canada goose season again in 1989-90. The Wisconsin Bureau ofWildlife Management supported recommendations from the Mississippi FlywayCouncil's Upper Region Regulations Committee for increased harvest of MississippiValley Population (MVP) Canada geese in 1989. The Wildlife Management Instituterecommended the continuation of restrictive regulations for Mid-Continentwhite-fronted geese. One individual supported more liberal bag limits forgeese. The Lower Region Regulations Committee of the Mississippi FlywayCouncil recommended a snow goose season of 80 days with a daily bag limitof 7, but supported continuation of frameworks for white-fronted geese.<T3>Response:</T3> The final frameworks in this document include provisionfor a Canada goose season in Arkansas and the more liberal regulationsfor MVP Canada geese recommended by the Mississippi Flyway Council's RegulationsCommittees. The boundary change in Iowa's Southwest Goose Zone is approved.Regarding Indiana's request for 3-way splits in its goose seasons withinexisting zones, the Service previously has permitted 3-way splits for bothducks and geese only in lieu of zoning in the Atlantic and Central Flyways,and believes this policy is still appropriate until the review of zoningand split season harvest strategies is completed. Therefore, splits withinzones continue to be limited to 2 segments.Central Flyway<T3>Written Comments:</T3> The Central Flyway Council recommendations onseason length and dates, bag limits, and other aspects of goose frameworksfor dark and light geese generally supported continuation of frameworksoffered in 1988, with minor changes in ``floating framework'' dates. Twochanges were recommended regarding light geese; one was to increase theseason length in the eastern tier of States to 100 days from the 86 daysoffered in 1988_the large size and continuing upward trend of the Mid-ContinentSnow Goose Population was cited as the reason for this change. The secondwas that the experimental light goose season in the Middle Rio Grande Valleyof New Mexico be made operational. That experimental season, initiatedin 1986, included an extended season of 107 days and a possession limitof 20 light geese, compared to 95 days and possession limit of 10 in theremainder of the State. The recommendation for operational status wouldcontinue the 107 day season but would drop the possession limit to 10.The Wildlife Management Institute recommended that actions be taken toincrease the Western Segment of the Mid-Continent White-fronted Goose Populationand that restrictive regulations be continued to prevent further declinesin the Eastern Segment Mid-Continent White-fronted Goose Population.<T3>Response:</T3> The season length for light geese in the eastern tierof Central Flyway States will be increased to 100 days and the experimentallight goose season in New Mexico will be operational, as proposed by theCentral Flyway Council. Light goose populations in both the eastern andwestern tier States of the Central Flyway are healthy and growing and shouldnot be adversely affected by these actions. With regard to recommendationsof the Wildlife Management Institute for actions to recover Western Mid-ContinentWhite-fronted Geese, the Service will take no specific action this yearbut has requested the Central and Mississippi Flyway Councils to reviewthe situation with both the Western and Eastern Segments of the Mid-ContinentWhite-fronted Goose Population and develop appropriate recommendations.The Eastern Segment has been increasing in recent years while the WesternSegment has declined, according to current surveys. These two populationsmay not be as separate as once believed and the Service, in cooperationwith the Flyway Councils, desires to intensify efforts to better understandthe relationship and status of these two segments. No liberalizations areplanned for either segment this year.Pacific Flyway <T3>Public Hearing Comments:</T3> Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the NationalWildlife Federation, recommended closing the season on cackling Canadageese and Pacific brant in the Pacific Flyway. <T3>Written Comments:</T3> The Pacific Flyway Council supported continuationof limited seasons for brant in California, Oregon, and Washington, restrictiveseasons for white-fronted geese, flywaywide closures for cackling Canadageese, and continuation of white goose seasons. They further recommendedthat the ending date for Canada geese in Colorado, Montana, most of Utah,and Wyoming, be moved from the first to the second Sunday in January, andthat the season length be increased from 86 to 88 days in Arizona, California,Colorado, New Mexico, and Utah, to accommodate weekend hunting with splitseasons. The Wildlife Management Institute recommended taking such actionsas necessary to accelerate recovery of four populations of Alaska nestinggeese that winter in the Pacific Flyway. The National Wildlife Federationsupported the cackling Canada goose closures in California, Oregon, andWashington. One individual from California requested a 21-day season witha bag limit increase from 1 to 2 white-fronted geese for the Klamath Basin.The Pacific Flyway Council and the California Fish and Game Departmentrecommended lifting restrictions on hunting large Canada geese in the Sacramentoand San Joaquin goose closure zones. Another individual from Californiaquestioned the need for these restrictive areas. <T3>Response:</T3> Consultation with the Division of Endangered Speciesand Habitat Conservation regarding proposed changes in frameworks thatwould have allowed the taking of certain kinds of Canada geese in two closedareas of California resulted in continuation of those closures. This wasdeemed advisable to minimize the incidental take of Aleutian Canada geese,an endangered species. In regard to comments questioning boundary location, it is noted that theboundaries used to delineate the California Canada goose closed areas werebased primarily on Aleutian Canada goose distribution and secondarily onrecognizability of those boundaries for enforcement purposes. The Serviceacknowledges the inequities perceived by individuals having property alongthe boundary, where those within the closed area cannot hunt Canada geesewhile those on adjacent properties outside can. However, the geese needprotection and a boundary must be established. While the Service recognizes that many hunters travel considerable distanceto hunt waterfowl in the Northeastern Zone of California and that hunterscontribute to the local economy, the welfare of the resource must be thedetermining factor in judging the appropriateness of regulations. The proposedand final frameworks both reflect a continued restrictive white-frontedgoose season for the Northeastern Zone. While this population of whitefrontshas shown improvements, it remains well below objective levels and belowlevels where liberalization throughout the flyway would be warranted. The Service believes the combination of closures and restrictive frameworksis appropriate for those populations of Alaska nesting geese that haveundergone declines.15. Tundra Swans <T3>Public Hearing Comments:</T3> Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the NationalWildlife Federation, Mr. Gary Myers, representing The Wildlife Society,and Mr. John M. Anderson, representing the National Audubon Society, supportedthe continuation of hunting opportunity for tundra swans. <T3>Written Comments:</T3> The States of Montana and Nevada offered correctionto an earlier document. The Atlantic and Pacific Flyway Councils, and theNational Wildlife Federation supported the proposal for tundra swan hunts.The Wildlife Information Center, Inc. (Center), recommended a ban on thehunting of tundra swans. The Center believes there are negative impactsto behavior and ecology of swans as a result of hunting and that alternativemethods should be developed to reduce crop damage. <T3>Response:</T3> Tundra swans currently exceed objective levels. Managementplans for both the eastern and western populations, including harvest strategies,have been developed to give adequate protection to the species. The Servicenotes the concern by some persons regarding tundra swan hunting but findsno biological reason to prohibit swan hunting. Therefore, the Service iscontinuing to approve carefully controlled tundra swan hunts in certainidentified States.17. Coots <T3>Written Comments:</T3> The California Department of Fish and Game requestedthat frameworks for this species be separated from the duck frameworksto provide additional hunting opportunity. <T3>Response:</T3> The Service notes that, nationally, coots and ducksare, and have been, regulated together, i.e., coot seasons are the sameas regular duck seasons. The Service intends to continue to regulate cootsand ducks together.20. Common Snipe <T3>Written Comments:</T3> The California Department of Fish and Game requestedthat frameworks for this species be separated from the duck frameworksto provide additional hunting opportunity. <T3>Response:</T3> The Service concurs with the California request. Theframeworks contained herein provide for snipe seasons to be independentof duck seasons as they are in other flyways.<ITAG tagnum="84">Nontoxic Shot Regulations </ITAG>In the April 13, 1989, <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 14814), the Service published a finalrule describing zones in which lead shot is prohibited for hunting waterfowl,coots and certain other species in the 1989-90 season. Waterfowl huntersare advised to become familiar with State and local regulations regardingthe use of nontoxic shot for waterfowl hunting.<ITAG tagnum="84">NEPA Consideration </ITAG>NEPA considerations are covered by the programmatic document, ``Final SupplementalEnvironmental Impact Statement: Issuance of Annual Regulations Permittingthe Sport Hunting of Migratory Birds (FSES 88-14)''; filed with EPA onJune 9, 1988. Notice of Availability was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on June 16, 1988 (53 FR 22582). The Service'sRecord of Decision was published on August 18, 1988 (53 FR 31341). However,this programmatic document does not prescribe year-specific regulations,those are developed annually. The annual regulations and options were consideredin the Environmental Assessment, <T3>Waterfowl Hunting Regulations for 1989.</T3><ITAG tagnum="84">Endangered Species Act Consideration </ITAG>On June 22, 1989, the Division of Endangered Species and Habitat Conservationconcluded that the proposed action is not likely to jeopardize the continuedexistence of listed species or result in the destruction or adverse modificationof their critical habitats. Hunting regulations are designed, among other things, to remove or alleviatechances of conflict between seasons for migratory game birds and the protectionand conservation of endangered and threatened species and their habitats.The Service's biological opinion resulting from its consultation undersection 7 is considered a public document and is available for inspectionin the Office of Endangered Species and Habitat Conservation and the Officeof Migratory Bird Management, U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Room 634,Arlington Square, 4401 North Fairfax Drive, Arlington, Virginia.<ITAG tagnum="85">Regulatory Flexibility Act, Executive Order 12291, and the PaperworkReduction Act </ITAG>In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> dated March 27, 1989 (54 FR 12534), the Servicereported measures it had undertaken to comply with requirements of theRegulatory Flexibility Act and the Executive Order. These included preparinga Determination of Effects and an updated Final Regulatory Impact Analysis,and publication of a summary of the latter. These regulations have beendetermined to be major under Executive Order 12291 and they have a significanteconomic impact on substantial numbers of small entities under the RegulatoryFlexibility Act. This determination is detailed in the aforementioned documentswhich are available upon request from the Office of Migratory Bird Management,U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Room 634-Arlington Square, Department ofthe Interior, Washington, DC 20240. These proposed regulations containno information collections subject to Office of Management and Budget reviewunder the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980.<ITAG tagnum="84">Memorandum of Law </ITAG>The Service published its Memorandum of Law, required by section 4 of ExecutiveOrder 12291, in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> dated August 11, 1989 (54 FR 32975).<ITAG tagnum="84">Authorship </ITAG>The primary author of this proposed rule is Morton M. Smith, Office ofMigratory Bird Management, working under the direction of Byron K. Williams,Acting Chief.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulations Promulgation </ITAG>The rulemaking process for migratory bird hunting must, by its nature,operate under severe time constraints. However, the Service is of the viewthat every attempt should be made to give the public the greatest possibleopportunity to comment on the regulations. Thus, when the proposed latehunting season rulemakings were published on August 16, 1989, the Serviceestablished what it believed was the longest period possible for publiccomment. In doing this the Service recognized that at the close of thecomment period, time would be of the essence. That is, if there was a delayin the effective date of these regulations after this final rulemaking,the Service is of the opinion that the States would have insufficient timeto select season dates, shooting hours and limits; to communicate theseselections to the Service; and to establish and publicize the necessaryregulations and procedures that implement their decisions. Therefore, the Service under authority of the Migratory Bird Treaty Actof July 3, 1918, as amended (40 Stat. 755; 16 U.S.C. 703 et seq.), prescribesfinal frameworks setting for the species to be hunted, the daily bag andpossession limits, the shooting hours, the season lengths, the earliestopening and closing season dates, and hunting areas, from which State conservationagency officials may select hunting season dates and other options. Uponreceipt of the season and option selections from State officials, the Servicewill publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a final rulemaking amending 50 CFR part 20 (andSection;andSection;20.104 through 20.107 and andSection; 20.109) to reflect seasons, limitsand shooting hours for the conterminous United States for the 1989-90 season.The Service therefore finds ``good cause'' exists, within the terms of5 U.S.C. 553(d)(3) of the Administrative Procedure Act, and these frameworkswill, therefore, take effect immediately upon publication.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 50 CFR Part 20 </ITAG>Exports, Hunting, Imports, Transportation, Wildlife. The rules that eventually will be promulgated for the 1989-90 hunting seasonare authorized under the Migratory Bird Treaty Act of July 3, 1918 (40Stat. 755; 16 U.S.C. 701-718h); the Fish and Wildlife Improvement Act of1978 (92 Stat. 3112; 16 U.S.C. 712); and the Alaska Game Act of 1925 (43Stat. 739; as amended, 54 Stat. 1103-04).<ITAG tagnum="85">Proposed Regulations Frameworks for 1989-90 Late Hunting Seasons onCertain Migratory Game Birds </ITAG>Pursuant to the Migratory Bird Treaty Act, the Secretary of the Interiorhas approved proposed frameworks for season lengths, shooting hours, bagand possession limits and outside dates within which States may selectseasons for hunting waterfowl and coots. Frameworks are summarized below.<ITAG tagnum="84">General </ITAG><T3>Split Season:</T3> States in all Flyways may split their season forducks, geese or brant into two segments. States in the Atlantic and CentralFlyways may, in lieu of zoning, split their season for ducks or geese intothree segments. Exceptions are noted in appropriate sections. <T3>Shooting Hours:</T3> From one-half hour before sunrise to sunset daily,for all species and seasons, including falconry seasons. <T3>Deferred Season Selections:</T3> States that did not select rail, woodcock,snipe, sandhill cranes, common moorhens and purple gallinules and sea duckseasons in July should do so at the time they make their waterfowl selections.Frameworks for open seasons and season lengths, bag and possession limitoptions, and other special provisions are listed below by Flyway.<ITAG tagnum="84">Atlantic Flyway </ITAG>The Atlantic Flyway includes Connecticut, Delaware, Florida, Georgia, Maine,Maryland, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, North Carolina,Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Carolina, Vermont, Virginia and WestVirginia.Ducks, Coots and MergansersHunting Seasons and Duck Limits:<T3>Outside Dates:</T3> Between October 7, 1989, and January 7, 1990. <T3>Hunting Season: </T3>Not more than 30 days. <T3>Canvasbacks: </T3>The season on canvasbacks is closed. <T3>Harlequin Ducks: </T3> The season on harlequin ducks is closed.<T3>Duck Limits:</T3> The daily bag limit is 3 and may include not morethan 1 hen mallard, 2 wood ducks, 2 redheads, 1 black duck, 1 mottled duck,1 pintail, and 1 fulvous tree duck. The possession limit is twice the dailybag limit. <T3>Merganser Limits: </T3>Throughout the Flyway the daily bag limit ofmergansers is 5, only 1 of which may be a hooded merganser. The possessionlimit is 10, only 2 of which may be hooded mergansers. <T3>Coot Limits: </T3>Throughout the Flyway daily bag and possession limitsof coots are 15 and 30, respectively. Zoning:<T3>New York:</T3> New York may, for the <T3>Long Island Zone,</T3> select season dates and daily bag and possessionlimits which differ from those in the remainder of the State.Upstate New York (excluding the Lake Champlain zone) may be divided intothree zones (West, North, South) for the purpose of setting separate duck,coot and merganser seasons. A 2-segment split season may be selected ineach zone.The <T3>West Zone</T3> is that portion of Upstate New York lying west of aline commencing at the north shore of the Salmon River and its junctionwith Lake Ontario and extending easterly along the north shore of the SalmonRiver to its intersection with Interstate Highway 81, then southerly alongInterstate Highway 81 to the Pennsylvania border.The <T3>North </T3>and <T3>South Zones</T3> are bordered on the west by the boundary describedabove and are separated from each other as follows: starting at the intersectionof Interstate Highway 81 and State Route 49 and extending easterly alongState Route 49 to its junction with State Route 365 at Rome, then easterlyalong State Route 365 to its junction with State Route 28 at Trenton, theneasterly along State Route 28 to its junction with State Route 29 at Middleville,then easterly along State Route 29 to its intersection with InterstateHighway 87 at Soratoga Springs, then northerly along Interstate Highway87 to its junction with State Route 9, then northerly along State Route9 to its junction with State Route 149, then easterly along State Route149 to its junction with State Route 4 at Fort Ann, then northerly alongState Route 4 to its intersection with the New York/Vermont boundary.<T3>Connecticut </T3> may be divided into two zones as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">a. </ITAG><T3>North Zone</T3>_That portion of the State north of interstate 95.<ITAG tagnum="15">b. </ITAG><T3>South Zone</T3>_That portion of the State south of Interstate 95.<T3>Maine</T3> may be divided into two zones as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">a.</ITAG><T3> North Zone</T3>_Game Management Zones 1 through 5.<ITAG tagnum="15">b.</ITAG><T3> South Zone</T3>_Game Management Zones 6 through 8.New Hampshire <T3>Coastal Zone</T3>_That portion of the State east of a boundary formedby State Highway 4 beginning at the Maine-New Hampshire line in Rollinsfordwest to the city of Dover, south to the intersection of State Highway 108,south along State Highway 108 through Madbury, Durham and Newmarket tothe junction of State Highway 85 in Newfields, south to State Highway 101in Exeter, east to State Highway 51 (Exeter-Hampton Expressway), east toInterstate 95 (New Hampshire Turnpike) in Hampton, and south along Interstate95 to the Massachusetts line.<T3>Inland Zone</T3>_That portion of the State north and west of the aboveboundary.<T3>West Virginia</T3> may be divided into two zones as follows: a. <T3>Allegheny Mountain Upland Zone</T3>_The eastern boundary extends southalong U.S. Route 220 through Keyser, West Virginia, to the intersectionof U.S. 50; follows U.S. Route 50 to the intersection with State Route93; follows State Route 93 south to the intersection with State Route 42and continues south on State Route 42 to Petersburg; follows State Route28 south to Minnehaha Springs; then follows State Route 39 west to U.S.Route 219; and follows U.S. Route 219 south to the intersection of Interstate64. The southern boundary follows I-64 west to the intersection with U.S.Route 60, and follows Route 60 west to the intersection of U.S. Route 19.The western boundary follows: Route 19 north to the intersection of I-79,and follows I-79 north to the intersection of U.S. Route 48. The northernboundary follows U.S. Route 48 east to the Maryland State line and theState line to the point of beginning.b. Remainder of the State_That portion outside the above boundaries.Zoning Experiments:<T3>Vermont </T3>may continue a Lake Champlain Zone. The Lake ChamplainZone of New York must follow the waterfowl season, daily bag and possessionlimits, and shooting hours selected by Vermont.<T3> Massachusetts, New Jersey, </T3> and<T3> Pennsylvania, </T3> may continue zoning experiments now in progressas shown in the sections that follow. <T3>Massachusetts </T3>and <T3>New Jersey</T3> may be divided into three zones, <T3> Pennsylvania</T3> into four zones and <T3>Vermont </T3>into two zones all on an experimental basis for the purposeof setting separate duck, coot and merganser seasons. A two-segment splitseason without penalty may be selected. The basic daily bag limit of ducksin each zone and the restrictions applicable to the regular season forthe Flyway also apply.<ITAG tagnum="84">Zone Definitions</ITAG>Massachusetts <T3>Western Zone</T3>_That portion of the State west of a line extendingfrom the Vermont line at Interstate 91, south to Route 9, west on Route9 to Route 10, south on Route 10 to Route 202, south on Route 202 to theConnecticut line.<T3>Central Zone</T3>_That portion of the State east of the Western Zoneand west of a line extending from the New Hampshire line at Interstate95 south to Route 1, south on Route 1 to I-93, south on I-93 to Route 3,south on Route 3 to Route 6, west on Route 6 to Route 28, west on Route28 to I-195, west to the Rhode Island line. <T3>EXCEPT</T3> the waters, and the lands 150 yards along the high-watermark, of the Assonit River to the Route 24 bridge, and the Taunton Riverto the Center St.-Elm St. bridge shall be in the Coastal Zone. <T3>Coastal Zone</T3>_That portion of the State east and south of the CentralZone.New Jersey<T3>Coastal Zone</T3>_That portion of New Jersey seaward of a continuousline beginning at the New York State boundary line in Raritan Bay; thenwest along the New York boundary line to its intersection with Route 440at Perth Amboy; then west on Route 440 to its intersection with the GardenState Parkway; then south on the Garden State Parkway to the shorelineat Cape May and continuing to the Delaware boundary in Delaware Bay.<T3>North Zone</T3>_That portion of New Jersey west of the Coastal Zoneand north of a boundary formed by Route 70 beginning at the Garden StateParkway west to the New Jersey Turnpike, north on the turnpike to Route206, north on Route 206 to Route 1, Trenton, west on Route 1 to the PennsylvaniaState boundary in the Delaware River.<T3>South Zone</T3>_That portion of New Jersey not within the North Zoneor the Coastal Zone.Pennsylvania<T3>Lake Erie Zone</T3>_The Lake Erie waters of Pennsylvania and a shorelinemargin along Lake Erie from New York on the east to Ohio on the west extending150 yards inland, but including all of Presque Isle Peninsula. <T3>North Zone</T3>_That portion of the State north of I-80 from the NewJersey line west to the junction of State Route 147; then north on StateRoute 147 to the junction of Route 220, then west and/or south on Route220 to the junction of I-80, then west on I-80 to its junctions with theAllegheny River, and then north along but not including the Allegheny Riverto the New York border.<T3>Northwest Zone</T3>_That portion of the State bounded on the northby the Lake Erie Zone and the New York line, on the east by an includingthe Allegheny River, on the south by Interstate Highway I-80, and on thewest by the Ohio line.<T3>South Zone</T3>_The remaining portion of the State.Vermont<T3>Lake Champlain Zone</T3>_Includes the United States portion of LakeChamplain and those portions of New York and Vermont which includes thatpart of New York lying east and north of boundary running south from theCanadian border along New York Route 9B to New York Route 9 south of Champlain,New York; New York Route 9 to New York Route 22 south of Keeseville; alongNew York Route 22 to South Bay, along and around the shoreline of SouthBay to New York Route 22; along New York Route 22 to U.S. Highway 4 atWhitehall; and along U.S. Highway 4 to the Vermont border. From the NewYork border at U.S. Highway 4, along U.S. Highway 4 to Vermont Route 22Aat Fair Haven; Route 22A to U.S. Highway 7 at Vergennes; U.S. Highway 7to the Canadian border.<T3>Interior Vermont Zone</T3>_The remaining portion of the State.<T3>Sea Ducks: </T3>The daily bag and possession limit for sea ducks inspecial sea duck areas is in addition to the limits applying to other ducksduring the regular duck season. In all areas outside of special sea duckareas, sea ducks are included in the regular duck season daily bag andpossession limits.<ITAG tagnum="84">Canada Geese</ITAG><T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths, and Limits: </T3>Between October 1,1989, and January 20, 1990, Maine, New Hampshire, Vermont, Massachusetts,Pennsylvania, and West Virginia may select 70-day seasons for Canada geesewith a daily bag and possession limit of 3 and 6 geese, respectively, exceptin Pennsylvania Counties of Erie, Mercer, Butler, and Crawford, where thedaily bag and possession limits are 2 and 4, respectively. In Maryland,Delaware, and Virginia (except Back Bay) the Canada goose season may be60 days with an opening date of October 31, 1989, and a closing date ofJanuary 20, 1990, with 2 geese daily and 4 in possession. In New York (includingLong Island), New Jersey, and that portion of Pennsylvania lying east andsouth of a boundary beginning at Interstate Highway 83 at the Marylandborder and extending north to Harrisburg, then east on I-81 to Route 443,east on 443 to Leighton, then east via 208 to Stroudsburg, then east onI-80 to the New Jersey line, the Canada goose season length may be 90 dayswith the opening framework date of October 1, 1989, and the closing frameworkdate extended to January 31, 1990. In addition, that portion of the SusquenhannaRiver from Harrisburg north to the confluence of the west and north branchesat Northumberland, including a 25-yard zone of land adjacent to the watersof the river, is included in the 90-day zone. The daily bag and possessionlimits within this area will be 1 and 2, respectively through October 15,1989, and 3 and 6, respectively thereafter. In Rhode Island and Connecticut(North Zone) season length will be 90 days between October 1, 1989, andJanuary 31, 1990, with a daily bag and possession limit of 3 and 6, respectively.In the South Zone of Connecticut (that portion south of Interstate 95),the Canada goose season length may be 90 days with the closing frameworkdate extended to February 5, 1990. The daily bag limit and possession limitwill be 3 and 6, respectively, through January 14, and 5 and 10, respectivelyfrom January 15 to February 5, 1990. This season in the South Zone of Connecticutis experimental. The Back Bay of Virginia, North Carolina (that portionsouth of Interstate Highway 95), and South Carolina may select an 11-dayseason for Canada geese within a January 20-30, 1990, framework; the dailybag and possession limits are 1 and 2 Canada geese, respectively. In theCoastal Zone of Massachusetts, a special resident Canada goose season maybe held during January 21, 1990, to February 5, 1990; the daily bag andpossession limits are 5 and 10, respectively. In Georgia, on specific areas(as described in State regulations), a special resident Canada goose seasonmay be held between January 13 and January 20, 1990, with a limit of 1per hunter per season. Closures on Canada geese: The season for Canadageese is closed in Florida.Snow Geese<T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths, and Limits: </T3>Between October 1,1989, and January 31, 1990, States in the Atlantic Flyway may select a90-day season for snow geese (including blue geese); the daily bag andpossession limits are 5 and 10, respectively. Between October 16, 1989,and October 28, 1989, a special snow goose season may be held in Delawareon Bombay Hook National Wildlife Refuge, Little Creek GMA, and immediatearea (as described in State regulations) at the discretion of the RefugeManager. Daily bay and possession limits are 5 and 10, respectively. Thisseason is in addition to the 90-day regular season.Atlantic Brant<T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths, and Limits: </T3>Between October 1,1989, and January 20, 1990, States in the Atlantic Flyway may select a50-day season for Atlantic brant; the daily bag and possession limits and2 and 4 brant, respectively.Tundra SwansIn New Jersey, Virginia, and North Carolina an experimental season fortundra swans may be selected with 200, 600 and 6,000 permits, respectively,subject to the following conditions: (a) The season may be 90 days andmust run concurrently with the snow goose season; (b) the State agencymust issue permits and obtain harvest and hunter participation data; and(c) each permittee is authorized to take one tundra swan per season.<ITAG tagnum="84">Mississippi Flyway</ITAG>The Mississippi Flyway includes Alabama, Arkansas, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa,Kentucky, Louisiana, Michigan, Minnesota, Mississippi, Missouri, Ohio,Tennessee, and Wisconsin.Ducks, Coots, and Mergansers <T3>Outside Dates: </T3>Between October 7, 1989, and January 7, 1990, inall States.<T3>Hunting Season: </T3>Not more than 30 days.<T3>Canvasbacks: </T3>The season on canvasbacks is closed.<T3>Limits: </T3>The daily bag limit of ducks is 3, and may include nomore than 2 mallards (no more than 1 of which may be a female), 1 blackduck, 1 pintail, 2 wood ducks, and 1 readhead. The possession limit istwice the daily bag limit.<T3>Merganser Limits: </T3>The daily bag limit of mergansers is 5, only1 of which may be a hooded merganser. The possession limit is twice thedaily bag limit.<T3>Coot Limits: </T3>The daily bag and possession limits are 15 and 30,respectively.<T3>Point-System Option: </T3>As an alternative to conventional bag limitsfor ducks, a 30-day season with point-system bag and possession limitsmay be selected within the framework dates prescribed. Point values forspecies and sexes taken are as follows: the female mallard, pintail, blackduck, redhead, and hooded merganser count 100 points each; the male mallardand wood duck count 50 points each; all other species of ducks and merganserscount 35 points each. The daily bag limit is reached when the point valueof the last bird taken, added to the sum of the point values of the otherbirds already taken during that day, reaches or exceeds 100 points. Thepossession limit is the maximum number of birds that legally could havebeen taken in 2 days.<T3>Pymatuning Reservoir Area, Ohio: </T3>The waterfowl seasons, limitsand shooting hours in the Pymatuning Reservoir area of Ohio will be thesame as those selected by Pennsylvania. The area includes Pymatuning Reservoirand that part of Ohio bounded on the north by County Road 306 known asWoodward Road, on the west by Pymatuning Lake Road, and on the south byU.S. Highway 322.<T3>Lower St. Francis River Area, Arkansas and Missouri: </T3>The waterfowlseasons, limits, and shooting hours in the lower St. Francis River areaof Arkansas and Missouri shall be same as those selected by Arkansas. The<T3>lower St. Francis River</T3> area is defined as that part of the St.Francis River that is south of U.S. Highway 62 that is the boundary betweenArkansas and Missouri and all sloughs and chutes (but not tributaries)connected to it.<T3>Zoning: Alabama, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Louisiana, Michigan, Missouri,Ohio, Tennessee, </T3>and <T3>Wisconsin </T3>may select hunting seasons for ducks, coots and mergansersby zones described as follows:<T3>Alabama: </T3>South Zone_Mobile and Baldwin Counties. North Zone_Theremainder of Alabama. The season in the South Zone may be split into twosegments.<T3>Illinois: </T3>North Zone_That portion of the State north of a linerunning east from the Iowa border along Illinois Highway 92 to I-280, eastalong I-280 to I-80, then east along I-80 to the Indiana border. CentralZone_That portion of the State between the North and South Zone boundaries.South Zone_That portion of the State south of a line running east fromthe Missouri border along the Modoc Ferry route to Randolph County Highway12, north along Highway 12 to Illinois Highway 3, north along IllinoisHighway 3 to Illinois Highway 159, north along Illinois Highway 159 toIllinois Highway 161, east along Illinois Highway 161 to Illinois Highway4, north along Illinois Highway 4 to I-70, then east along I-70 to theIndiana border.<T3>Indiana: </T3>North Zone: That portion of the State north of a lineextending east from the Illinois border along State Highway 18 to U.S.Highway 31, then north along U.S. 31 to U.S. Highway 24, then east alongU.S. 24 to Huntington, then southeast along U.S. Highway 224 to the Ohioborder. Ohio River Zone: That portion of Indiana south of a line extendingeast from the Illinois border along Interstate Highway 64 to New Albany,then east along State Highway 62 to State Highway 56, then east along StateHighway 56 to Vevay, then on State Highway 156 along the Ohio River toNorth Landing, then north along State Highway 56 to U.S. Highway 50, thennortheast along U.S. 50 to the Ohio border. South Zone: That portion ofthe State between the North and Ohio River Zone boundaries. The seasonin each zone may be split into two segments.<T3>Iowa: </T3>North Zone_That portion of Iowa north of a line runningwest from the Illinois border along I-80 to U.S. 59, north along U.S. 59to State Highway 37, northwest along State Highway 37 to State Highway175, then west along State Highway 175 to the Nebraska border. South Zone_theremainder of the State.<T3>Louisiana: </T3>West Zone_That portion of the State west of a boundarybeginning at the Arkansas-Louisiana border on Louisiana Highway 3, thensouth along Louisiana Highway 3 to Bossier City, east along Interstate20 to Minden, south along Louisiana Highway 7 to Ringgold, east along LouisianaHighway 4 to Jonesboro, south along U.S. Highway 167 to Lafayette, southeastalong U.S. Highway 90 to Houma, south along the Houma Navigation Channelto the Gulf of Mexico through Cat Island Pass. East Zone_The remainderof Louisiana. The season in each zone may be split into two segments.<T3>Michigan: </T3>North Zone_The Upper Peninsula. South Zone_That portionof the State south of a line beginning at the Wisconsin border in LakeMichigan due west of the mouth of Stony Creek in Oceana County; then dueeast to, and east and south along the south shore of, Stony Creek to WebsterRoad, east and south on Webster Road to Stony Lake Road, east on StonyLake and Garfield Roads to M-20, east on M-20 to U.S.-10B.R. in the cityof Midland, east on U.S.-10B.R. to U.S.-10, east on U.S.-10 and M-25 tothe Saginaw River, downstream along the thread of the Saginaw River toSaginaw Bay, then on a northeasterly line, passing one-half mile northof the Corps of Engineers confined disposal island offshore of the Carnpowerplant, to a point one mile north of the Charity islands, then continuingnortheasterly to the Ontario border in Lake Huron. Middle Zone_The remainderof the State. Michigan may split its season in each zone into two segments.<T3>Missouri: </T3>North Zone_That portion of Missouri north of a linerunning east from the Kansas border along U.S. Highway 54 to U.S. Highway65, south along U.S. 65 to State Highway 32, east along State Highway 32to State Highway 72, east along State Highway 72 to State Highway 21, southalong State Highway 21 to U.S. Highway 60, east along U.S. 60 to StateHighway 51, south along State Highway 51 to State Highway 53, south alongState Highway 53 to U.S. Highway 62, east along U.S. 62 to I-55, northalong I-55 to State Highway 34, then east along State Highway 34 to theIllinois border. South Zone_The remainder of Missouri. Missouri may splitits season in each zone into two segments.<T3>Ohio: </T3>North Zone_The counties of Darke, Miami, Clark, Champaign,Union, Delaware, Licking, Muskingam, Guernsey, Harrison and Jefferson andall counties north thereof. In addition, the North Zone also includes thatportion of the Buckeye Lake area in Fairfield and Perry Counties boundedon the west by State Highway 37, on the south by State Highway 204, andon the east by State Highway 13. Ohio River Zone_The counties of Hamilton,Clermont, Brown, Adams, Scioto, Lawrence, Gallia and Meigs. South Zone_Thatportion of the State between the North and Ohio River Zone boundaries.Ohio may split its season in each zone into two segments.<T3>Tennessee: </T3>Reelfoot Zone_Lake and Obion Counties, or a designatedportion of that area. State Zone_The remainder of Tennessee. Seasons maybe split into two segments in each zone.<T3>Wisconsin: </T3>North Zone_That portion of the State north of a lineextending northerly from the Minnesota border along the center line ofthe Chippewa River to State Highway 35, east along State Highway 35 toState Highway 25, north along State Highway 25 to U.S. Highway 10, eastalong U.S. Highway 10 to its junction with the Manitowoc Harbor in thecity of Manitowoc, then easterly to the eastern State boundary in LakeMichigan. South Zone_The remainder of Wisconsin. The season in the SouthZone may be split into two segments.Geese<T3>Definition: </T3>For the purpose of hunting regulations listed below,the term ``geese'' also includes brant.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The various zones and areas identified in this section aredescribed in the respective States' regulations.</ITAG><T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths and Limits: </T3>Between September 30,1989, and January 21, 1990 (January 31 in Kentucky, Arkansas, Tennessee,Mississippi, and Alabama), States may select seasons for geese not to exceed70 days for Canada and white-fronted geese and 80 days for snow (includingblue) geese. The daily bag limit is 7 geese, to include no more than 3Canada and 2 white-fronted geese. The possession limit is 14 geese, toinclude no more than 6 Canada and 4 white-fronted geese. Specific regulationsfor Canada geese and exceptions to the above general provisions are shownbelow by State.<T3>Outside Dates and Limits on Snow and White-fronted Geese in Louisiana:</T3>Between September 30, 1989, and February 14, 1990, Louisiana may hold80-day seasons on snow (including blue) geese and 70-day seasons on white-frontedgeese by zones established for duck hunting seasons. Daily bag and possessionlimits are as described above.<T3>Minnesota. </T3>In the:(a) West Central Goose Zone_the season for Canada geese may extend for30 days. In the Lac Qui Parle Goose Zone the season will close after 30days or when 4,000 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Throughoutthe 5-county area, limits are 1 Canada goose daily and 2 in possession.(b) Southeast Goose Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for 70consecutive days. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.In selected areas of the Metro Goose Management Block and in Olmsted County,experimental 10-day late seasons may be held during December to harvestGiant Canada geese. During these seasons, limits are 2 Canada geese dailyand 4 in possession.(c) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may extend for 40days. Limits are 1 Canada goose daily and 2 in possession.<T3>Iowa: </T3>The season may extend for 45 consecutive days. Limits are2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession. The season for geese in the SouthwestGoose Zone may be held at a different time than the season in the remainderof the State.<T3>Missouri: </T3>In the:(a) Swan Lake Zone_The season for Canada geese closes after 40 days orwhen 10,000 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Limits are2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(b) Southeast Zone_A 50-day season on Canada geese may be selected, withlimits of 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(c) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may extend for 40days in the respective duck hunting zones. Limits are 1 Canada goose dailyand 4 in possession.<T3>Wisconsin: </T3>The framework opening date for all geese is September23. The total harvest of Canada geese in the State will be limited to 93,700birds. In the:(a) Horicon Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 62,000 birds.The season may not exceed 76 days. All Canada geese harvested must be taggedand the total number of tags issued will be limited so that the quota of62,000 birds is not exceeded. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 inpossession.(b) Theresa Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 5,000 birds.The season may not exceed 70 days. Limits are 1 Canada goose per permitteeper 7-day period and 4 for the entire season.(c) Pine Island Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 1,700 birds.The season may not exceed 70 days. All Canada geese harvested must be tagged.Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 for the entire season.(d) Collins Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 2,700 birds.The season may not exceed 70 days. All Canada geese harvested must be tagged.Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in the entire season.(e) Exterior Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 22,300 birds.The season may not exceed 70 days, except as noted below. Limits are 1Canada goose daily and 2 in possession through October 31, and 2 dailyand 4 in possession thereafter, except as noted below. In the MississippiRiver Subzone, the season for Canada geese may extend for 70 days. Limitsare 1 Canada goose daily and 2 in possession through October 31, and 2daily and 4 in possession thereafter. In the Brown County Subzone, a speciallate season to control local populations of giant Canada geese may be heldduring December 1-31. The daily bag and possession limits during this seasonare 3 and 6 birds, respectively, In the Rock Prairie Subzone, a speciallate season to harvest giant Canada geese may be held between November5 and December 10. During this late season, limits are 1 Canada goose dailyand 2 in possession.In Wisconsin, the progress of the Canada goose harvest must be monitoredin the exterior zone, and that zone's season closed, if necessary, to insurethat the harvest does not exceed the quota stated above.<T3>Illinois: </T3>The total harvest of Canada geese in the State willbe limited to 103,500 birds. In the:(a) Southern Illinois Quota Zone_The season for Canada geese will closeafter 56 days or when 51,750 birds have been harvested, whichever occursfirst. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 10 in possessin through December31, and 3 daily and 10 in possession thereafter.(b) Rend Lake Quota Zone_The season for Canada geese will close after 56days or when 15,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first.Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 10 in possession through December 31,and 3 daily and 10 in possession thereafter.(c) Tri-County Zone_The season for Canada geese may not exceed 50 days.Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 10 in possession.(d) Remainder of State_Seasons for Canada geese up to 60 days may be selectedby zones established for duck hunting seasons. Limits are 2 Canada geesedaily and 10 in possession.<T3>Michigan: </T3>The total harvest of Canada geese in the State willbe limited to 89,400 birds. In the:(a) North Zone:(1) West of Forest Highway 13_The framework opening date for all geeseis September 23 and the season for Canada geese may extend for 53 days,except in the Superior Counties Goose Management Area (GMA), whee the seasonwill close after 53 days or when 11,000 birds have been harvested, whicheveroccurs first. Limits are 3 Canada geese daily and 6 in possession.(2) Remainder of North Zone_The framework opening for all geese is September26 and the season for Canada geese may extend for 50 days. Limits are 2Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(b) Middle Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for 50 days. Limitsare 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession through November 22, and 3daily and 6 in possession thereafter.(c) South Zone:(1) Allegan County GMA_The season for Canada geese will close after 55days or when 5,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Limitsare 1 Canada geese daily and 2 in possession.(2) Muskegon Wastewater GMA_The season for Canada geese will close after50 days or when 700 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first.Limits is 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(3) Saginaw County GMA_The season for Canada geese will close after 50days or when 4,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Limitsare 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(4) Fish Point GMA_The season for Canada geese will close after 50 daysor when 2,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Limitsare 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(5) Remainder of South Zone:(i) West of U.S. Highway 27/127_The season for Canada geese may extendfor 50 days. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(ii) East of U.S. Highway 27/127_The season for Canada geese may extendfor 40 days. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.(d) Southern Michigan GAM_A late Canada goose season of up to 30 days maybe held between January 6 and February 4, 1990. Limits are 2 Canada geesedaily and 4 in possession.<T3>Ohio: </T3>Canada goose limits are 2 daily and 4 in possession.<T3>Indiana: </T3>The total harvest of Canada geese in the State will belimited to 39,700 birds. In:(a) Posey County_The season for Canada geese will close after 70 days orwhen 11,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Limits are3 Canada geese daily and 6 in possession. The season may extend to Janaury31, 1990.(b) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may extend for 70days. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.<T3>Kentucky: </T3>In the:(a) Western Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for 70 days, andthe harvest will be limited to 31,000 birds. Of the 31,000-bird quota,20,000 birds will be allocated to the Ballard Reporting Area and 6,000birds will be allocated to the Henderson/Union Reporting Area. If the quotain either reporting area is reached prior to completion of the 70-day season,the season in that reporting area will be closed. If this occurs, the seasonin those counties and portions of counties outside of, but associated with,the respective subzone (listed in State regulations) may continue for anadditional 7 days, not to exceed a total of 70 days. The season in FultonCounty may extend to February 15, 1990. Limits are 3 Canada geese dailyand 6 in possession.(b) Remainder of the State_The season may extend for 70 days. Limits are2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.<T3>Tennessee: </T3>In the:(a) Northwest Tennessee Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for70 days, and the harvest will be limited to 12,400 birds. Of the 12,400bird quota, 8,600 birds will be allocated to the Reelfoot Quota Zone. Ifthe quota in the Reelfoot Quota Zone is reached prior to completion ofthe 70-day season, the season in the quota zone will be closed. If thisoccurs, the season in the remainder of the Northwest Tennessee Zone maycontinue for an additional 7 days, not to exceed a total of 70 days. Theseason may extend to February 15, 1990. Limits are 3 Canada geese dailyand 6 in possession.(b) Southwest Tennessee Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for30 days, and the harvest will be limited to 700 birds. Limits are 2 Canadageese daily and 4 in possession.(c) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may extend for 70days. Limits are 2 Canada geese daily and 4 in possession.<T3>Arkansas: </T3>The season for Canada geese may extend for 70 days.Limits are 3 Canada geese daily and 6 in possession.<T3>Louisiana: </T3>The season for Canada geese is closed.<T3>Mississippi: </T3>The season for Canada geese may extend for 70 days.Limits are 3 Canada geese daily and 6 in possession.<T3>Alabama: </T3>Canada geese limits are 2 daily and 4 in possession.<T3>Missouri, Illinois, Indiana, Kentucky and Tennessee Quota Zone Closures:</T3> When it has been determined that the quota of Canada geese allottedto the Southern Illinois Quota Zone, the Rend Lake Quota Zone in Illinois,the Swan Lake Zone in Missouri, Posey County in Indiana, the Ballard andHenderson-Union Subzones in Kentucky and the Reelfoot Subzone in Tennesseewill have been filled, the season for taking Canada geese in the respectivearea will be closed by the Director upon giving public notice through localinformation media at least 48 hours in advance of the time and date ofclosing, or by the State through State regulations with such notice andtime (not less than 48 hours) as they deem necessary.<T3>Shipping Restriction: </T3>In Illinois and Missouri and in the Kentuckycounties of Ballard, Hickman, Fulton and Carlisle, geese may not be transported,shipped or delivered for transportation or shipment by common carrier,the Postal Service, or by any person except as the personal baggage oflicensed waterfowl hunters, provided that no hunter shall possess or transportmore than the legally-prescribed possession limit of geese. Geese possessedor transported by persons other than the taker must be labeled with thename and address of the taker and the date taken.<ITAG tagnum="84">Central Flyway</ITAG>The Central Flyway includes Colorado (east of the Continental Divide),Kansas, Montana (Blaine, Carbon, Fergus, Judith Basin, Stillwater, Sweetgrass,Wheatland and all counties east thereof), Nebraska, New Mexico (east ofthe Continental Divide except that the entire Jicarilla Apache Indian Reservationis in the Pacific Flyway), North Dakota, Oklahoma, South Dakota, Texasand Wyoming (east of the Continental Divide).Ducks (including mergansers) and Coots<T3>Outside Dates: </T3>October 7, 1989, through January 7, 1990.<T3>Canvasbacks: </T3>The season on canvasbacks is closed.<T3>Hunting Season: </T3>Seasons in the Low Plains Unit may include nomore than 39 days. Seasons in the High Plains Mallard Management Unit mayinclude no more than 51 days, provided that the last 12 days may startno earlier than December 9, 1989. The High Plains Unit, roughly definedas that portion of the Central Flyway which lies west of the 100th meridian,shall be described in State regulations.States may split their seasons into 2 or, in lieu of zoning, 3 segments.<T3>Daily Bag and Possession Limits: </T3>The daily bag limit is 3 ducks,including no more than 2 mallards, no more than 1 of which may be a female,1 mottled duck, 1 pintail, 1 redhead, 1 hooded merganser, and 2 wood ducks.The possession limit is twice the daily bag limit. Daily bag and possessionlimits for coots are 15 and 30, respectively.States in the Central Flyway may, as an alternative to the conventionalbag limit for ducks, select a point system of bag and possession limits.Point categories will be as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>100 points</T3>_female mallard, pintail, redhead, hooded merganser,mottled duck<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>50 points</T3>_male mallard, wood duck<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>35 points</T3>_All other ducks and mergansersUnder the point system, the daily bag limit is reached when the point valueof the last bird taken, added to the sum of point values of all other ducksalready taken during that day, reaches or exceeds 100 points. The possessionlimit is the maximum number of ducks that legally could have been takenin 2 days.<T3>Zoning: </T3>Duck and coot hunting seasons may be selected independentlyin existing zones as described in the following States:<T3>Montana </T3>(Central Flyway portion):Experimental Zone 1. The counties of Bighorn, Blaine, Carbon, Daniels,Fergus, Garfield, Golden Valley, Judith Basin, McCone, Musselshell, Petroleum,Phillips, Richland, Roosevelt, Sheridan, Stillwater, Sweetgrass, Valley,Wheatland and Yellowstone.Experimental Zone 2. The counties of Carter, Custer, Dawson, Fallon, PowderRiver, Prairie, Rosebud, Treasure and Wibaux.<T3>Nebraska </T3>(Low Plains portion):<T3>Zone 1. </T3>Keya Paha County east of U.S. Highway 183 and all of BoydCounty includng the adjacent waters of the Niobrara River.<T3>Zone 2. </T3>The area bounded by designated highways and politicalboundaries starting on U.S. 73 at the State Line near Falls City; northto N-67; north through Nemaha to U.S. 73-75; north to U.S. 34; west tothe Alvo Road; north to U.S. 6; northeast to N-63; north and west to U.S.77; north to N-92; west to U.S. 81; south to N-66; west to N-14; southto I-80; west to U.S. 34; west to N-10; south to the State Line; west toU.S. 283; north to N-23; west to N-47; north to U.S. 30; east to N-14;north to N-52; northwesterly to N-91; west to U.S. 281; north to WheelerCounty and including all of Wheeler and Garfield Counties and Loup Countyeast of U.S. 183; east on N-70 from Wheeler County to N-14; south to N-39;southeast to N-22; east to U.S. 81; southeast to U.S. 30; east to U.S.73; north to N-51; east to the State Line; and south and west along theState Line to the point of beginning.<T3>Zone 3. </T3>The area, excluding Zone 1, north of Zone 2.<T3>Zone 4. </T3>The area south of Zone 2.<T3>New Mexico:</T3><T3>Experimental Zone 1. </T3>The Central Flyway portion of New Mexiconorth of Interstate Highway 40 and U.S. Highway 54.Experimental Zone 2. The remainder of the Central Flyway portion of NewMexico.<T3>Oklahoma:</T3><T3>Zone 1. </T3>That portion of northwestern Oklahoma, except the Panhandle,bounded by the following highways: starting at the Texas-Oklahoma border,OK 33 to OK 47, OK 47 to U.S. 183, U.S. 183 to I-40, I-40 to U.S. 177,U.S. 177 to OK 33, OK 33 to I-35, I-35 to U.S. 60, U.S. 60 to U.S. 64,U.S. 64 to OK 132, and OK 132 to the Oklahoma-Kansas state line.<T3>Zone 2. </T3>The remainder of the Low Plains.<T3>South Dakota </T3>(Low Plains portion):<T3>South Zone. </T3>Bon Homme, Yankton and Clay Counties south of S.D.Highway 50; Charles Mix County south and west of a line formed by S.D.Highway 50 from Douglas County to Geddes, Highways CFAS 6198 and FAS 6516to Lake Andes, and S.D. Highway 50 to Bon Homme County; Gregory County;and Union County south and west of S.D. Highway 50 and Interstate Highway29.<T3>North Zone. </T3>The remainder of the Low Plains.Geese<T3>Definitions: </T3>In the Central Flyway, ``geese'' includes all speciesof geese and brant, ``dark geese'' includes Canada and white-fronted geeseand black brant, and ``light geese'' includes all others.<T3>Outside Dates: </T3>September 30, 1989, through January 21, 1990, fordark geese and September 30, 1989, through February 18, 1990 (February28, 1990, in New Mexico), for light geese.<T3>Possession Limits: </T3>Goose possession limits are twice the dailybag limits.<T3>Hunting Seasons: </T3>Seasons in States, and independently in describedgoose management units within States, may be as follows:<T3>Colorado: </T3>No more than 95 days with a daily limit of 5 geese thatmay include no more than 2 dark geese.<T3>Kansas: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 72 days with daily limitsof 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November26 and no more than 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose during theremainder of the season.For Light Goose Unit 1 (that area east of U.S. 75 and north of I-70), nomore than 100 days with a daily limit of 5.For Light Goose Unit 2 (the remainder of Kansas), no more than 100 dayswith a daily limit of 5.<T3>Montana: </T3>No more than 95 days with daily limits of 2 dark geeseand 3 light geese in Sheridan County and 3 dark geese and 3 light geesein the remainder of the Central Flyway portion of the State.<T3>Nebraska: </T3>For Dark Goose Unit 1 (Boyd, Cedar west of U.S. 81,Keya Paha east of U.S. 183, and Knox Counties), no more than 79 days withdaily limits of 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November17 and no more than 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-frontedgoose for the remainder of the season.For Dark Goose Unit 2 (the remainder of the State east of the followinghighways starting at the South Dakota line; U.S. 183 to NE 2, NE 2 to U.S.281, and U.S. 281 to Kansas), no more than 72 days with daily limits of2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November19 and no more than 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose for the remainderof the season.For Dark Goose Unit 3 (that part of the State west of Units 1 and 2), nomore than 72 days with daily limits of 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada gooseand 1 white-fronted goose through November 19 and no more than 1 Canadagoose and 1 white-fronted goose for the remainder of the season.For light geese, no more than 100 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>New Mexico: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 95 days with a dailylimit of 2.For light geese in the Rio Grande Valley Unit (the Central Flyway portionof New Mexico in Socorro and Valencia Counties), no more than 107 dayswith a daily limit of 5 and a possession limit of 10.For light geese in the remainder of the Central Flyway portion of New Mexico,no more than 95 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>North Dakota: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 72 days with dailylimits of 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose or 2 white-fronted geesethrough October 29 and no more than 2 dark geese during the remainder ofthe season.For light geese, no more than 100 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>Oklahoma: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 72 days with a daily limitof 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose.For light geese, no more than 100 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>South Dakota: </T3>For dark geese in the Missouri River Unit (the Countiesof Bon Homme, Brule, Buffalo, Campbell, Charles Mix, Corson east of SDHighway 65, Dewey, Gregory, Haakon north of Kirley Road and east of PlumCreek, Hughes, Hyde, Lyman north of Interstate 90 and east of U.S. Highway183, Potter, Stanley, Sully, Tripp east of U.S. Highway 183, Walworth,and Yankton west of U.S. Highway 81), no more than 79 days with daily limitsof 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November 17 and nomore than 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose forthe remainder of the season.For dark geese in the remainder of the State, no more than 72 days witha daily limit of 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose.For light geese, no more than 100 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>Texas: </T3>West of U.S. 81, no more than 95 days with a daily limitof 5 geese which may include no more than 2 dark geese.For dark geese east of U.S. 81, no more than 72 days with a daily limitof 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose.For light geese east of U.S. 81, no more than 100 days with a daily limitof 5.<T3>Wyoming: </T3>No more than 95 days with a daily limit of 2.Tundra SwansThe following States may issue permits authorizing each permittee to takeno more than one tundra swan, subject to guidelines in the current, approvedHunt Plan for the Eastern Population of Tundra Swans, and specified conditionsas follows:<T3>Montana: </T3>(Central Flyway portion): No more than 500 permits withthe season dates concurrent with the season for taking geese.<T3>North Dakota: </T3>No more than 1,000 permits with the season datesconcurrent with the season for taking light geese.<T3>South Dakota: </T3>No more than 500 permits with the season dates concurrentwith the season for taking light geese.<ITAG tagnum="84">Pacific Flyway</ITAG>The Pacific Flyway includes Arizona, California, Colorado (west of theContinental Divide), Idaho, Montana (including and to the west of Hill,Chouteau, Cascade, Meagher and Park Counties), Nevada, New Mexico (theJicarilla Apache Indian Reservation and west of the Continental Divide),Oregon, Utah, Washington and Wyoming (west of the Continental Divide includingthe Great Divide Basin).Ducks, Coots, and Common Moorhens<T3>Outside Dates: </T3>Between October 7, 1989, and January 7, 1990.<T3>Hunting Seasons: </T3>Seasons may be split into two segments. Concurrent59-day seasons on ducks (including mergansers), coots, and common moorhens(gallinules) may be selected except as subsequently noted. In the Oregoncounties of Morrow and Umatilla and in Washington all areas lying eastof the summit of the Cascade Mountains and east of the Big White SalmonRiver in Klickitat County, the seasons may be an additional 7 days.<T3>Duck Limits: </T3>The basic daily bag limit is 4 ducks, including nomore than 3 mallards, no more than 1 of which may be a female, 1 pintail,1 canvasback, and 2 redheads but no more than 1 canvasback and 1 redheadin combination. The possession limit is twice the daily bag limit.<T3>Coot and Common Moorhen (Gallinule) Limits: </T3>The daily bag andpossession limit of coots and common moorhens is 25 singly or in the aggregate.<T3>California_Waterfowl Zones: </T3>Season dates for the Colorado RiverZone of California must coincide with season dates selected by Arizona.Season dates for the Northeastern and Southern Zones of California maydiffer from those in the remainder of the State.<T3>Idaho_Waterfowl Zones: </T3>Duck and goose season dates for Zone 1and Zone 2 may differ. Zone 1 includes all lands and waters within theFort Hall Indian Reservation and Bannock County; Bingham County exceptthat portion within the Blackfoot Reservoir drainage; and Power Countyeast of State Highway 37 and State Highway 39. Zone 2 includes the remainderof the State.<T3>Nevada_Clark County Waterfowl Zone: </T3>Season dates for Clark Countymay differ from those in the remainder of Nevada.Geese (including Brant)<T3>Outside dates, season lengths and limits on geese (including brant):</T3>Seasons may be split into two segments. Between September 30, 1989,and January 21, 1990, a 93-day season on geese (except brant in Washington,Oregon, and California) may be selected, except as subsequently noted.The basic daily bag and possession limit is 6, provided that the dailybag limit includes no more than 3 white geese (snow, including blue, andRoss' geese) and 3 dark geese (all other species of geese). In Washingtonand Idaho, the daily bag and possession limits are 3 and 6 geese, respectively.Washington, Oregon, and California may select an open season for brantwith daily bag and possession limits of 2 and 4 brant, respectively. Brantseasons may not exceed 16-consecutive days in Washington and Oregon and30-consecutive days in California.<T3>Aleutian Canada goose closure: </T3>There will be no open season onAleutian Canada geese. Emergency closures may be invoked for all Canadageese should Aleutian Canada goose distribution patterns or other circumstancesjustify such actions.<T3>California, Oregon, Washington_Cackling Canada goose closure: </T3>Therewill be no open season on cackling Canada geese in California, Oregon,and Washington.<T3>California Canada goose and dark goose closures: </T3>Three areas inCalifornia, described as follows, are restricted in the hunting of certaingeese:(1) In the counties of Del Norte and Humboldt there will be no open seasonfor Canada geese.(2) In the Sacramento Valley in that area bounded by a line beginning atWillows in Glenn County proceeding south on Interstate Highway 5 to thejunction with Hahn Road north of Arbuckle in Colusa County; then easterlyon Hahn Road and the Grimes Arbuckle road to Grimes on the Sacramento River;then southerly on the Sacramento River to the Tisdale Bypass where it meetsO'Banion Road; then easterly on O'Banion Road to State Highway 99; thennortherly on State Highway 99 to its junction with the Gridley-Colusa Highwayin Gridley in Butte County; then westerly on the Gridley-Colusa Highwayto its junction with the River Road; then northerly on the River Road tothe Princeton Ferry; then westerly across the Sacramento River to StateHighway 45; then northerly on State Highway 45 to its junction with StateHighway 162; then continuing northerly on State Highway 45-162 to Glenn;then westerly on State Highway 162 to the point of beginning in Willows,there will be no open seaon for Canada geese. In this area, the seasonon white-fronted geese must end on or before November 30, 1989.(3) In the San Joaquin Valley in that area bounded by a line beginningat Modesto in Stanislaus County proceeding west on State Highway 132 tothe junction of Interstate Highway 5; then southerly on Interstate Highway5 to the junction of State Highway 152 in Merced County; then easterlyon State Highway 152 to the junction of State Highway 59; then northerlyon State Highway 59 to the junction of State Highway 99 at Merced; thennortherly and westerly on State Highway 99 to the point of beginning; thehunting season for Canada geese will close no later than November 23, 1989.<T3>California (Northeastern Zone)_geese: </T3>In the Northeastern Zoneof California the season may be from October 14, 1989, to January 14, 1990,except that white-fronted geese may be taken only during October 14 toNovember 5, 1989. Limits will be 3 geese per day and 6 in possession, ofwhich not more than 1 white-fronted goose or 2 Canada geese shall be inthe daily limit and not more than 2 white-fronted geese and 4 Canada geeseshall be in possession.<T3>California (Balance of the State Zone)_geese: </T3>In the Balance ofthe State Zone the season may be from October 28, 1989, through January14, 1990, except that white-fronted geese may be taken only during October28, 1989, to December 31, 1989. Limits shall be 3 geese per day and inpossession, of which not more than 1 may be a dark goose. The dark gooselimits may be expanded to 2 provided that they are Canada geese (exceptAleutian and cackling Canada geese for which the season is closed).<T3>Western Oregon: </T3>In those portions of Coos and Curry Counties lyingwest of U.S. Highway 101 and that portion of Western Oregon west and northof a line starting at Oregon-Washington State line on the Columbia River;south on Interstate Highway 5 to its junction with State Highway 22 atSalem; east on State Highway 22 to the Stayton cutoff; south on the Staytoncutoff through Stayton and straight south to the Santiam River; west (downstream)on the Santiam River to Interstate Highway 5; south on Interstate Highway5 to State Highway 126 at Eugene; west on State Highway 126 to State Highway36; north on State Highway 36 to Forest Road 5070 at Brickerville; westand south on Forest Road 5070 to State Highway 126; west on State Highway126 and ending at the Oregon coast, except for designated areas, thereshall be no open season on Canada geese. In the remainder of Western Oregon,the season and limits shall be the same as those for the Pacific Flyway,except the seasons in the designated area must end upon attainment of theirindividual quotas which collectively equal 210 dusky Canada geese. Huntingof Canada geese in those designated areas shall only be by hunters possesssinga state-issued permit authorizing them to do so.<T3>Oregon (Lake and Klamath Counties)_geese: </T3>In the Oregon countiesof Lake and Klamath the season on white-fronted geese will not open beforeNovember 1.<T3>Washington and Oregon (Columbia Basin Portions)_geese: </T3>In theWashington counties of Adams, Benton, Douglas, Franklin, Grant, Kittitas,Klickitat, Lincoln, Walla Walla and Yakima, and in the Oregon countiesof Gilliam, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa and Wasco, the gooseseason may be an additional 7 days. <T3>Western Washington: </T3>In Clark, Cowlitz, Wahkiakum, and PacificCounties, except for areas to be designated by the State, there shall beno open season on Canada geese. For designated areas the seasons must endupon attainment of individual quotas which collectively will equal 90 duskyCanada geese. Hunting of Canada geese in those designated areas shall onlybe by hunters possessing a state-issued permit authorizing them to do so.<T3>Idaho, Oregon and Montana_Pacific Population of Canada geese: </T3>Inthat portion of Idaho lying west of the line formed by U.S. Highway 93north from the Nevada border to Shoshone, thence northerly on Idaho StateHighway 75 (formerly U.S. Highway 93) to Challis, thence northerly on U.S.Highway 93 to the Montana border (except Boundary, Bonner, Kootenai, Benewah,Shoshone, Latah, Nez Perce, Lewis, Clearwater and Idaho Counties); in theOregon counties of Baker and Malheur; and in Montana (Pacific Flyway portionwest of the Continental Divide), the daily bag and possession limits are2 and 4 Canada geese, respectively; and the season for Canada geese maynot extend beyond January 7, 1990. <T3>Montana and Wyoming_Rocky Mountain Population of Canada Geese: </T3>InMontana (Pacific Flyway portion east of the Continental Divide) and Wyomingthe season may not extend beyond January 14, 1990. In Lincoln, Sweetwaterand Sublette Counties, Wyoming, the combined special sandhill crane-Canadagoose seasons and the regular season shall not exceed 93 days. <T3>Idaho, Colorado and Utah: </T3>In that portion of Idaho lying eastof the line formed by U.S. Highway 93 north from the Nevada border to Shoshone,thence northerly on Idaho State Highway 75 (formerly U.S. Highway 93) toChallis, thence northerly on U.S. Highway 93 to the Montana border; inColorado; and in Utah, except Washington County, the daily bag and possessionlimits are 2 and 4 Canada geese, respectively, and the season for Canadageese may be no more than 88 days and may not extend beyond January 14,1990. <T3>Nevada: </T3>Nevada may designate season dates on geese in Clark Countyand in Elko County and that portion of White Pine County within Ruby LakeNational Wildlife Refuge differing from those in the remainder of the State.In Clark County the season on Canada geese may be no more than 86 days.Except for Clark County the daily bag and possession limits are 2 and 4Canada geese, respectively. In Clark County the daily bag and possessionlimits are 2 Canada geese. <T3>Arizona, California, Utah and New Mexico: </T3>In California, the ColoradoRiver Zone where the season must be the same as that selected by Arizonaand the Southern Zone; in Arizona; in New Mexico; and in Washington County,Utah; the season for Canada geese may be no more than 88 days. The dailybag and possession limit is 2 Canada geese except in that portion of CaliforniaDepartment of Fish and Game District 22 within the Southern Zone (i.e.Imperial Valley) where the daily bag and possession limits for Canada geeseare 1 and 2, respectively. Tundra Swans In Utah, Nevada and Montana, an open season for tundra swans may be selectedunder the following conditions: (a) Between September 30, 1989, and January21, 1990, a 93-day season may be selected, and seasons may be split intotwo segments; (b) appropriate State agency must issue permits and obtainharvest and hunter participation data; (c) in Utah, no more than 2,500permits may be issued, authorizing each permittee to take 1 tundra swan;(d) in Nevada, no more than 650 permits may be issued, authorizing eachpermittee to take 1 tundra swan in either Churchill, Lyon, or PershingCounties; (e) in Montana, no more than 500 permits may be issued authorizingeach permittee to take 1 tundra swan in either Teton, Cascade, Hill, Liberty,Toole or Pondera County. Common Snipe <T3>Outside dates: </T3>Between September 1, 1989, and February 28, 1990.<T3>Hunting Seasons and Daily Bag and Possession Limits: </T3>Seasons maynot exceed 107 days, but may be split into 2 segments. Bag and possessionlimits are 8 and 16, respectively. <ITAG tagnum="84">Special Falconry Frameworks </ITAG>Falconry is a permitted means of taking migratory game birds in any Statemeeting Federal falconry standards in 50 CFR 21.29(k). These States mayselect an extended season for taking migratory game birds in accordancewith the following: <T3>Extended Seasons: </T3>For all hunting methods combined, the combinedlength for the extended season, regular season, and any special or experimentalseasons shall not exceed 107 days for any species or group of species ina geographical area. Each extended season may be divided into a maximumof 3 segments. <T3>Framework Dates: </T3>Seasons must fall between September 1, 1989 andMarch 10, 1990. <T3>Daily Bag and Possession Limits: </T3>Falconry daily bag and possessionlimits for all permitted migratory game birds shall not exceed 3 and 6birds, respectively, singly or in the aggregate, during extended falconryseasons, any special or experimental seasons, and regular hunting seasonsin all States, including those that do not select an extended season. <T3>Regular Seasons: </T3>General hunting regulations, including seasonsand hours, apply to falconry in each State listed in 50 CFR 21.29(k). Regularseason bag and possession limits do not apply to falconry.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Total season length for all hunting methods combined shallnot exceed 107 days for any species or group of species in one geographicalarea. The extension of this framework to include the period September 1,1989-March 10, 1990, and the option to split the extended falconry seasoninto a maximum of 3 segments are considered tentative, and will be evaluatedin cooperation with States offering such extensions after a period of severalyears.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 7, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John F. Turner, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-22057 Filed 9-18-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-55-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>